Chapter 5
The Window on the West
 It seemed to Sam that he had only dozed for a few minutes when he awoke to find
that it was late afternoon and Faramir had come back. He had brought many men
with him; indeed all the survivors of the foray were now gathered on the slope
nearby, two or three hundred strong. They sat in a wide semicircle, between the
arms of which Faramir was seated on the ground, while Frodo stood before him. It
looked strangely like the trial of a prisoner.
 Sam crept out from the fern, but no one paid any attention to him, and he placed
 179
himself at the end of the rows of men, where he could see and hear all that was
going on. He watched and listened intently, ready to dash to his master's aid if
needed. He could see Faramir's face, which was now unmasked: it was stern and
commanding, and a keen wit lay behind his searching glance. Doubt was in the grey
eyes that gazed steadily at Frodo.
 Sam soon became aware that the Captain was not satisfied with Frodo's account
of himself at several points: what part he had to play in the Company that set out
from Rivendell; why he had left Boromir; and where he was now going. In particular
he returned often to Isildur's Bane. Plainly he saw that Frodo was concealing from
him some matter of great importance.
 'But it was at the coming of the Halfling that Isildur's Bane should waken, or so one
must read the words,' he insisted. 'If then you are the Halfling that was named,
doubtless you brought this thing, whatever it may be, to the Council of which you
speak, and there Boromir saw it. Do you deny it?'
 Frodo made no answer. 'So!' said Faramir. 'I wish then to learn from you more of it;
for what concerns Boromir concerns me. An orc-arrow slew Isildur, so far as old tales
tell. But orc-arrows are plenty, and the sight of one would not be taken as a sign of
Doom by Boromir of Gondor. Had you this thing in keeping? It is hidden, you say; but
is not that because you choose to hide it?'
 'No, not because I choose,' answered Frodo. 'It does not belong to me. It does not
belong to any mortal, great or small; though if any could claim it, it would be Aragorn
son of Arathorn, whom I named, the leader of our Company from Moria to Rauros.'
 'Why so, and not Boromir, prince of the City that the sons of Elendil founded?'
 'Because Aragorn is descended in direct lineage, father to father, from Isildur
Elendil's son himself. And the sword that he bears was Elendil's sword.'
 A murmur of astonishment ran through all the ring of men. Some cried aloud: 'The
sword of Elendil! The sword of Elendil comes to Minas Tirith! Great tidings!' But
Faramir's face was unmoved.
 'Maybe,' he said. 'But so great a claim will need to be established and clear proofs
will be required, should this Aragorn ever come to Minas Tirith. He had not come, nor
any of your Company, when I set out six days ago.'
 'Boromir was satisfied of that claim,' said Frodo. 'Indeed, if Boromir were here, he
would answer all your questions. And since he was already at Rauros many days
back, and intended then to go straight to your city, if you return, you may soon learn
the answers there. My part in the Company was known to him, as to all the others,
for it was appointed to me by Elrond of Imladris himself before the whole Council. On
that errand I came into this country, but it is not mine to reveal to any outside the
Company. Yet those who claim to oppose the Enemy would do well not to hinder it.'
 Frodo's tone was proud, whatever he felt, and Sam approved of it; but it did not
appease Faramir.
 'So!' he said. 'You bid me mind my own affairs, and get me back home, and let you
be. Boromir will tell all, when he comes. When he comes, say you! Were you a friend
of Boromir?'
 Vividly before Frodo's mind came the memory of Boromir's assault upon him, and
for a moment he hesitated. Faramir's eyes watching him grew harder. 'Boromir was a
valiant member of our Company,' said Frodo at length. 'Yes, I was his friend, for my
part.'
 Faramir smiled grimly. 'Then you would grieve to learn that Boromir is dead?'
 'I would grieve indeed,' said Frodo. Then catching the look in Faramir's eyes, he
faltered. 'Dead?' he said. 'Do you mean that he is dead, and that you knew it? You
 180
have been trying to trap me in words, playing with me? Or are you now trying to
snare me with a falsehood?'
 'I would not snare even an orc with a falsehood,' said Faramir.
 'How then did he die, and how do you know of it? Since you say that none of the
Company had reached the city when you left.'
 'As to the manner of his death, I had hoped that his friend and companion would
tell me how it was.'
 'But he was alive and strong when we parted. And he lives still for all that I know.
Though surely there are many perils in the world.'
 'Many indeed,' said Faramir, 'and treachery not the least.'
 Sam had been getting more and more impatient and angry at this conversation.
These last words were more than he could bear, and bursting into the middle of the
ring, he strode up to his master's side.
 'Begging your pardon, Mr. Frodo,' he said, 'but this has gone on long enough. He's
no right to talk to you so. After all you've gone through, as much for his good and all
these great Men as for anyone else.
 'See here, Captain!' He planted himself squarely in front of Faramir his hands on
his hips, and a look on his face as if he was addressing a young hobbit who had
offered him what he called 'sauce' when questioned about visits to the orchard.
There was some murmuring, but also some grins on the faces of the men looking on:
the sight of their Captain sitting on the ground and eye to eye with a young hobbit,
legs well apart, bristling with wrath, was one beyond their experience. 'See here!' he
said. 'What are you driving at? Let's come to the point before all the Orcs of Mordor
come down on us! If you think my master murdered this Boromir and then ran away,
you've got no sense; but say it, and have done! And then let us know what you mean
to do about it. But it's a pity that folk as talk about fighting the Enemy can't let others
do their bit in their own way without interfering. He'd be mighty pleased, if he could
see you now. Think he'd got a new friend, he would.'
 'Patience!' said Faramir, but without anger. 'Do not speak before your master,
whose wit is greater than yours. And I do not need any to teach me of our peril. Even
so, I spare a brief time, in order to judge justly in a hard matter. Were I as hasty as
you, I might have slain you long ago. For I am commanded to slay all whom I find in
this land without the leave of the Lord of Gondor. But I do not slay man or beast
needlessly, and not gladly even when it is needed. Neither do I talk in vain. So be
comforted. Sit by your master, and be silent!'
Sam sat down heavily with a red face. Faramir turned to Frodo again: 'You asked
how do I know that the son of Denethor is dead. Tidings of death have many wings.
Night oft brings news to near kindred, 'tis said. Boromir was my brother.'
 A shadow of sorrow passed over his face. 'Do you remember aught of special mark
that the Lord Boromir bore with him among his gear?'
 Frodo thought for a moment, fearing some further trap, and wondering how this
debate would turn in the end. He had hardly saved the Ring from the proud grasp of
Boromir, and how he would fare now among so many men, warlike and strong, he
did not know. Yet he felt in his heart that Faramir, though he was much like his
brother in looks, was a man less self-regarding, both sterner and wiser. 'I remember
that Boromir bore a horn,' he said at last.
 'You remember well, and as one who has in truth seen him,' said Faramir. 'Then
maybe you can see it in your mind's eye: a great horn of the wild ox of the East,
bound with silver, and written with ancient characters. That horn the eldest son of our
house has borne for many generations; and it is said that if it be blown at need
 181
anywhere within the bounds of Gondor, as the realm was of old, its voice will not
pass unheeded.
 'Five days ere I set out on this venture, eleven days ago at about this hour of the
day, I heard the blowing of that horn: from the northward it seemed, but dim, as if it
were but an echo in the mind. A boding of ill we thought it, my father and I, for no
tidings had we heard of Boromir since he went away, and no watcher on our borders
had seen him pass. And on the third night after another and a stranger thing befell
me.
 'I sat at night by the waters of Anduin, in the grey dark under the young pale moon,
watching the ever-moving stream; and the sad reeds were rustling. So do we ever
watch the shores nigh Osgiliath, which our enemies now partly hold, and issue from
it to harry our lands. But that night all the world slept at the midnight hour. Then I
saw, or it seemed that I saw, a boat floating on the water, glimmering grey, a small
boat of a strange fashion with a high prow, and there was none to row or steer it.
 'An awe fell on me, for a pale light was round it. But I rose and went to the bank,
and began to walk out into the stream, for I was drawn towards it. Then the boat
turned towards me, and stayed its pace, and floated slowly by within my hand's
reach, yet I durst not handle it. It waded deep, as if it were heavily burdened, and it
seemed to me as it passed under my gaze that it was almost filled with clear water,
from which came the light; and lapped in the water a warrior lay asleep.
 'A broken sword was on his knee. I saw many wounds on him. It was Boromir, my
brother, dead. I knew his gear, his sword, his beloved face. One thing only I missed:
his horn. One thing only I knew not: a fair belt, as it were of linked golden leaves,
about his waist. Boromir! I cried. Where is thy horn? Whither goest thou? O Boromir!
But he was gone. The boat turned into the stream and passed glimmering on into the
night. Dreamlike it was, and yet no dream, for there was no waking. And I do not
doubt that he is dead and has passed down the River to the Sea.'
 'Alas!' said Frodo. 'That was indeed Boromir as I knew him. For the golden belt
was given to him in Lothlorien by the Lady Galadriel. She it was that clothed us as
you see us, in elven-grey. This brooch is of the same workmanship.' He touched the
green and silver leaf that fastened his cloak beneath his throat.
Faramir looked closely at it. 'It is beautiful,' he said. 'Yes, 'tis work of the same
craft. So then you passed through the Land of Lorien? Laurelindorenan it was named
of old, but long now it has lain beyond the knowledge of Men,' he added softly,
regarding Frodo with a new wonder in his eyes. 'Much that was strange about you I
begin now to understand. Will you not tell me more? For it is a bitter thought that
Boromir died, within sight of the land of his home.'
 'No more can I say than I have said,' answered Frodo. 'Though your tale fills me
with foreboding. A vision it was that you saw, I think, and no more, some shadow of
evil fortune that has been or will be. Unless indeed it is some lying trick of the
Enemy. I have seen the faces of fair warriors of old laid in sleep beneath the pools of
the Dead Marshes, or seeming so by his foul arts.'
 'Nay, it was not so,' said Faramir. 'For his works fill the heart with loathing; but my
heart was filled with grief and pity.'
 'Yet how could such a thing have happened in truth?' asked Frodo. 'For no boat
could have been carried over the stony hills from Tol Brandir; and Boromir purposed
to go home across the Entwash and the fields of Rohan. And yet how could any
vessel ride the foam of the great falls and not founder in the boiling pools, though
laden with water?'
 'I know not,' said Faramir. 'But whence came the boat?'
 182
 'From Lorien,' said Frodo. 'In three such boats we rowed down Anduin to the Falls.
They also were of elven-work.'
 'You passed through the Hidden Land,' said Faramir, 'but it seems that you little
understood its power. If Men have dealings with the Mistress of Magic who dwells in
the Golden Wood, then they may look for strange things to follow. For it is perilous
for mortal man to walk out of the world of this Sun, and few of old came thence
unchanged, 'tis said.
 'Boromir, O Boromir!' he cried. 'What did she say to you, the Lady that dies not?
What did she see? What woke in your heart then? Why went you ever to
Laurelindorenan, and came not by your own road, upon the horses of Rohan riding
home in the morning?'
 Then turning again to Frodo, he spoke in a quiet voice once more. 'To those
questions I guess that you could make some answer, Frodo son of Drogo. But not
here or now, maybe. But lest you still should think my tale a vision, I will tell you this.
The horn of Boromir at least returned in truth, and not in seeming. The horn came,
but it was cloven in two, as it were by axe or sword. The shards came severally to
shore: one was found among the reeds where watchers of Gondor lay, northwards
below the infalls of the Entwash; the other was found spinning on the flood by one
who had an errand in the water. Strange chances, but murder will out, 'tis said.
 'And now the horn of the elder son lies in two pieces upon the lap of Denethor,
sitting in his high chair, waiting for news. And you can tell me nothing of the cleaving
of the horn?'
 'No, I did not know of it,' said Frodo. 'But the day when you heard it blowing, if your
reckoning is true, was the day when we parted, when I and my servant left the
Company. And now your tale fills me with dread. For if Boromir was then in peril and
was slain, I must fear that all my companions perished too. And they were my
kindred and my friends.
 'Will you not put aside your doubt of me and let me go? I am weary, and full of
grief, and afraid. But I have a deed to do, or to attempt, before I too am slain. And
the more need of haste, if we two halflings are all that remain of our fellowship.
 'Go back, Faramir, valiant Captain of Gondor, and defend your city while you may,
and let me go where my doom takes me.'
 'For me there is no comfort in our speech together,' said Faramir, 'but you surely
draw from it more dread than need be. Unless the people of Lorien themselves came
to him, who arrayed Boromir as for a funeral? Not Orcs or servants of the Nameless.
Some of your Company, I guess, live still.
 'But whatever befell on the North March, you, Frodo, I doubt no longer. If hard days
have made me any judge of Men's words and faces, then I may make a guess at
Halflings! Though,' and now he smiled, 'there is something strange about you, Frodo,
an elvish air, maybe. But more lies upon our words together than I thought at first. I
should now take you back to Minas Tirith to answer there to Denethor, and my life
will justly be forfeit, if I now choose a course that proves ill for my city. So I will not
decide in haste what is to be done. Yet we must move hence without more delay.'
 He sprang to his feet and issued some orders. At once the men who were
gathered round him broke up into small groups, and went off this way and that,
vanishing quickly into the shadows of the rocks and trees. Soon only Mablung and
Damrod remained.
 'Now you, Frodo and Samwise, will come with me and my guards,' said Faramir.
'You cannot go along the road southwards, if that was your purpose. It will be unsafe
for some days, and always more closely watched after this affray than it has been
 183
yet. And you cannot, I think, go far today in any case, for you are weary. And so are
we. We are going now to a secret place we have, somewhat less than ten miles from
here. The Orcs and spies of the Enemy have not found it yet, and if they did, we
could hold it long even against many. There we may lie up and rest for a while, and
you with us. In the morning I will decide what is best for me to do, and for you.'
 There was nothing for Frodo to do but to fall in with this request, or order. It
seemed in any case a wise course for the moment, since this foray of the men of
Gondor had made a journey in Ithilien more dangerous than ever.
 They set out at once: Mablung and Damrod a little ahead, and Faramir with Frodo
and Sam behind. Skirting the hither side of the pool where the hobbits had bathed,
they crossed the stream, climbed a long bank, and passed into green-shadowed
woodlands that marched ever downwards and westwards. While they walked, as
swiftly as the hobbits could go, they talked in hushed voices.
 'I broke off our speech together,' said Faramir, 'not only because time pressed, as
Master Samwise had reminded me, but also because we were drawing near to
matters that were better not debated openly before many men. It was for that reason
that I turned rather to the matter of my brother and let be Isildur's Bane. You were
not wholly frank with me, Frodo.'
 'I told no lies, and of the truth all I could,' said Frodo.
 'I do not blame you,' said Faramir. 'You spoke with skill in a hard place, and wisely,
it seemed to me. But I learned or guessed more from you than your words said. You
were not friendly with Boromir, or you did not part in friendship. You, and Master
Samwise, too, I guess have some grievance. Now I loved him dearly, and would
gladly avenge his death, yet I knew him well. Isildur's Bane – I would hazard that
Isildur's Bane lay between you and was a cause of contention in your Company.
Clearly it is a mighty heirloom of some sort, and such things do not breed peace
among confederates, not if aught may be learned from ancient tales. Do I not hit
near the mark?'
 'Near,' said Frodo, 'but not in the gold. There was no contention in our Company,
though there was doubt: doubt which way we should take from the Emyn Muil. But
be that as it may, ancient tales teach us also the peril of rash words concerning such
things as – heirlooms.'
 'Ah, then it is as I thought: your trouble was with Boromir alone. He wished this
thing brought to Minas Tirith. Alas! it is a crooked fate that seals your lips who saw
him last, and holds from me that which I long to know: what was in his heart and
thought in his latest hours. Whether he erred or no, of this I am sure: he died well,
achieving some good thing. His face was more beautiful even than in life.
 'But, Frodo, I pressed you hard at first about Isildur's Bane. Forgive me! It was
unwise in such an hour and place. I had not had time for thought. We had had a hard
fight, and there was more than enough to fill my mind. But even as I spoke with you,
I drew nearer to the mark, and so deliberately shot wider. For you must know that
much is still preserved of ancient lore among the Rulers of the city that is not spread
abroad. We of my house are not of the line of Elendil, though the blood of Numenor
is in us. For we reckon back our line to Mardil, the good steward, who ruled in the
king's stead when he went away to war. And that was King Earnur, last of the line of
Anarion, and childless, and he came never back. And the stewards have governed
the city since that day, though it was many generations of Men ago.
 'And this I remember of Boromir as a boy, when we together learned the tale of our
sires and the history of our city, that always it displeased him that his father was not
king. "How many hundreds of years needs it to make a steward a king, if the king
 184
returns not? " he asked. "Few years, maybe, in other places of less royalty," my
father answered. "In Gondor ten thousand years would not suffice." Alas! poor
Boromir. Does that not tell you something of him?'
 'It does,' said Frodo. 'Yet always he treated Aragorn with honour.'
 'I doubt it not,' said Faramir. 'If he were satisfied of Aragorn's claim as you say, he
would greatly reverence him. But the pinch has not yet come. They had not yet
reached Minas Tirith or become rivals in her wars.
 'But I stray. We in the house of Denethor know much ancient lore by long tradition,
and there are moreover in our treasuries many things preserved: books and tablets
writ on withered parchments, yea, and on stone, and on leaves of silver and of gold,
in divers characters. Some none can now read; and for the rest, few ever unlock
them. I can read a little in them, for I have had teaching. It was these records that
brought the Grey Pilgrim to us. I first saw him when I was a child, and he has been
twice or thrice since then.'
 'The Grey Pilgrim?' said Frodo. 'Had he a name?'
 'Mithrandir we called him in elf-fashion,' said Faramir, 'and he was content. Many
are my names in many countries, he said. Mithrandir among the Elves; Tharkun to
the Dwarves; Olorin I was in my youth in the West that is forgotten, in the South
Incanus; in the North Gandalf; to the East I go not. '
 'Gandalf!' said Frodo. 'I thought it was he. Gandalf the Grey dearest of counsellors.
Leader of our Company. He was lost in Moria.'
 'Mithrandir was lost!' said Faramir. 'An evil fate seems to have pursued your
fellowship. It is hard indeed to believe that one of so great wisdom, and of power –
for many wonderful things he did among us – could perish, and so much lore be
taken from the world. Are you sure of this, and that he did not just leave you and
depart where he would?'
 'Alas! yes,' said Frodo. 'I saw him fall into the abyss.'
 'I see that there is some great tale of dread in this,' said Faramir, 'which perhaps
you may tell me in the evening-time. This Mithrandir was, I now guess, more than a
lore-master: a great mover of the deeds that are done in our time. Had he been
among us to consult concerning the hard words of our dream, he could have made
them clear to us without need of messenger. Yet, maybe, he would not have done
so, and the journey of Boromir was doomed. Mithrandir never spoke to us of what
was to be, nor did he reveal his purposes. He got leave of Denethor, how I do not
know, to look at the secrets of our treasury, and I learned a little of him, when he
would teach (and that was seldom). Ever he would search and would question us
above all else concerning the Great Battle that was fought upon Dagorlad in the
beginning of Gondor, when He whom we do not name was overthrown. And he was
eager for stories of Isildur, though of him we had less to tell; for nothing certain was
ever known among us of his end.'
 Now Faramir's voice sank to a whisper. 'But this much I learned or guessed, and I
have kept it ever secret in my heart since: that Isildur took somewhat from the hand
of the Unnamed, ere he went away from Gondor, never to be seen among mortal
men again. Here I thought was the answer to Mithrandir's questioning. But it seemed
then a matter that concerned only the seekers after ancient learning. Nor when the
riddling words of our dream were debated among us, did I think of Isildur's Bane as
being this same thing. For Isildur was ambushed and slain by orc-arrows, according
to the only legend that we knew, and Mithrandir had never told me more.
 'What in truth this Thing is I cannot yet guess; but some heirloom of power and
peril it must be. A fell weapon, perchance, devised by the Dark Lord. If it were a thing
 185
that gave advantage in battle. I can well believe that Boromir, the proud and fearless,
often rash, ever anxious for the victory of Minas Tirith (and his own glory therein),
might desire such a thing and be allured by it. Alas that ever he went on that errand!
I should have been chosen by my father and the elders but he put himself forward,
as being the older and the hardier (both true), and he would not be stayed.
 'But fear no more! I would not take this thing, if it lay by the highway. Not were
Minas Tirith falling in ruin and I alone could save her, so, using the weapon of the
Dark Lord for her good and my glory. No. I do not wish for such triumphs, Frodo son
of Drogo.'
 'Neither did the Council,' said Frodo. 'Nor do I. I would have nothing to do with such
matters.'
 'For myself,' said Faramir, 'I would see the White Tree in flower again in the courts
of the kings, and the Silver Crown return, and Minas Tirith in peace: Minas Anor
again as of old, full of light, high and fair, beautiful as a queen among other queens:
not a mistress of many slaves, nay, not even a kind mistress of willing slaves. War
must be, while we defend our lives against a destroyer who would devour all; but I do
not love the bright sword for its sharpness, nor the arrow for its swiftness, nor the
warrior for his glory. I love only that which they defend: the city of the Men of
Numenor; and I would have her loved for her memory, her ancientry, her beauty, and
her present wisdom. Not feared, save as men may fear the dignity of a man, old and
wise.
 'So fear me not! I do not ask you to tell me more. I do not even ask you to tell me
whether I now speak nearer the mark. But if you will trust me, it may be that I can
advise you in your present quest, whatever that be – yes, and even aid you.'
 Frodo made no answer. Almost he yielded to the desire for help and counsel, to tell
this grave young man, whose words seemed so wise and fair, all that was in his
mind. But something held him back. His heart was heavy with fear and sorrow: if he
and Sam were indeed, as seemed likely, all that was now left of the Nine Walkers,
then he was in sole command of the secret of their errand. Better mistrust
undeserved than rash words. And the memory of Boromir, of the dreadful change
that the lure of the Ring had worked in him, was very present to his mind, when he
looked at Faramir and listened to his voice: unlike they were, and yet also much akin.
 They walked on in silence for a while, passing like grey and green shadows under
the old trees, their feet making no sound; above them many birds sang, and the sun
glistened on the polished roof of dark leaves in the evergreen woods of Ithilien.
 Sam had taken no part in the conversation, though he had listened; and at the
same time he had attended with his keen hobbit ears to all the soft woodland noises
about them. One thing he had noted, that in all the talk the name of Gollum had not
once come up. He was glad, though he felt that it was too much to hope that he
would never hear it again. He soon became aware also that though they walked
alone, there were many men close at hand: not only Damrod and Mablung flitting in
and out of the shadows ahead, but others on either side, all making their swift secret
way to some appointed place.
 Once, looking suddenly back, as if some prickle of the skin told him that he was
watched from behind, he thought he caught a brief glimpse of a small dark shape
slipping behind a tree-trunk. He opened his mouth to speak and shut it again. 'I'm not
sure of it,' he said to himself, 'and why should I remind them of the old villain, if they
choose to forget him? I wish I could!'
 So they passed on, until the woodlands grew thinner and the land began to fall
more steeply. Then they turned aside again, to the right, and came quickly to a small
 186
river in a narrow gorge: it was the same stream that trickled far above out of the
round pool, now grown to a swift torrent, leaping down over many stones in a deepcloven bed,
overhung with ilex and dark box-woods. Looking west they could see,
below them in a haze of light, lowlands and broad meads, and glinting far off in the
westering sun the wide waters of the Anduin.
 'Here, alas! I must do you a discourtesy,' said Faramir. 'I hope you will pardon it to
one who has so far made his orders give way to courtesy as not to slay you or to
bind you. But it is a command that no stranger, not even one of Rohan that fights
with us, shall see the path we now go with open eyes. I must blindfold you.'
 'As you will,' said Frodo. 'Even the Elves do likewise at need, and blindfolded we
crossed the borders of fair Lothlorien. Gimli the dwarf took it ill, but the hobbits
endured it.'
 'It is to no place so fair that I shall lead you,' said Faramir. 'But I am glad that you
will take this willingly and not by force.'
 He called softly and immediately Mablung and Damrod stepped out of the trees
and came back to him. 'Blindfold these guests,' said Faramir. 'Securely, but not so as
to discomfort them. Do not tie their hands. They will give their word not to try and
see. I could trust them to shut their eyes of their own accord, but eyes will blink, if the
feet stumble. Lead them so that they do not falter.'
 With green scarves the two guards now bound up the hobbits' eyes and drew their
hoods down almost to their mouths; then quickly they took each one by the hand and
went on their way. All that Frodo and Sam knew of this last mile of the road they
learned from guessing in the dark. After a little they found that they were on a path
descending steeply; soon it grew so narrow that they went in single file, brushing a
stony wall on either side; their guards steered them from behind with hands laid
firmly on their shoulders. Now and again they came to rough places and were lifted
from their feet for a while, and then set down again. Always the noise of the running
water was on their right hand, and it grew nearer and louder. At length they were
halted. Quickly Mablung and Damrod turned them about, several times, and they lost
all sense of direction. They climbed upwards a little: it seemed cold and the noise of
the stream had become faint. Then they were picked up and carried down, down
many steps, and round a corner. Suddenly they heard the water again, loud now,
rushing and splashing. All round them it seemed, and they felt a fine rain on their
hands and cheeks. At last they were set on their feet once more. For a moment they
stood so, half fearful, blindfold, not knowing where they were; and no one spoke.
 Then came the voice of Faramir close behind. 'Let them see!' he said. The scarves
were removed and their hoods drawn back, and they blinked and gasped.
 They stood on a wet floor of polished stone, the doorstep, as it were, of a roughhewn gate of rock
opening dark behind them. But in front a thin veil of water was
hung, so near that Frodo could have put an outstretched arm into it. It faced
westward. The level shafts of the setting sun behind beat upon it, and the red light
was broken into many flickering beams of ever-changing colour. It was as if they
stood at the window of some elven-tower, curtained with threaded jewels of silver
and gold, and ruby, sapphire and amethyst, all kindled with an unconsuming fire.
 'At least by good chance we came at the right hour to reward you for your
patience,' said Faramir. 'This is the Window of the Sunset, Henneth Annun, fairest of
all the falls of Ithilien, land of many fountains. Few strangers have ever seen it. But
there is no kingly hall behind to match it. Enter now and see!'
 Even as he spoke the sun sank, and the fire faded in the flowing water. They
turned and passed under the low forbidding arch. At once they found themselves in a
 187
rock-chamber, wide and rough, with an uneven stooping roof. A few torches were
kindled and cast a dim light on the glistening walls. Many men were already there.
Others were still coming in by twos and threes through a dark narrow door on one
side. As their eyes grew accustomed to the gloom the hobbits saw that the cave was
larger than they had guessed and was filled with great store of arms and victuals.
 'Well, here is our refuge,' said Faramir. 'Not a place of great ease but here you may
pass the night in peace. It is dry at least, and there is food, though no fire. At one
time the water flowed down through this cave and out of the arch, but its course was
changed further up the gorge, by workmen of old, and the stream sent down in a fall
of doubled height over the rocks far above. All the ways into this grot were then
sealed against the entry of water or aught else, all save one. There are now but two
ways out: that passage yonder by which you entered blindfold, and through the
Window-curtain into a deep bowl filled with knives of stone. Now rest a while, until
the evening meal is set.'
 The hobbits were taken to a corner and given a low bed to lie on, if they wished.
Meanwhile men busied themselves about the cave, quietly and in orderly quickness.
Light tables were taken from the walls and set up on trestles and laden with gear.
This was plain and unadorned for the most part, but all well and fairly, made: round
platters, bowls and dishes of glazed brown clay or turned box-wood, smooth and
clean. Here and there was a cup or basin of polished bronze; and a goblet of plain
silver was set by the Captain's seat in the middle of the inmost table.
 Faramir went about among the men, questioning each as he came in, in a soft
voice. Some came back from the pursuit of the Southrons; others, left behind as
scouts near the road, came in latest. All the Southrons had been accounted for, save
only the great mumak: what happened to him none could say. Of the enemy no
movement could be seen; not even an orc-spy was abroad.
 'You saw and heard nothing, Anborn?' Faramir asked of the latest comer.
 'Well, no, lord,' said the man. 'No Orc at least. But I saw, or thought I saw,
something a little strange. It was getting deep dusk, when the eyes make things
greater than they should be. So perhaps it may have been no more than a squirrel.'
Sam pricked up his ears at this. 'Yet if so, it was a black squirrel, and I saw no tail.
'Twas like a shadow on the ground, and it whisked behind a tree-trunk when I drew
nigh and went up aloft as swift as any squirrel could. You will not have us slay wild
beasts for no purpose, and it seemed no more, so I tried no arrow. It was too dark for
sure shooting anyway, and the creature was gone into the gloom of the leaves in a
twinkling. But I stayed for a while, for it seemed strange, and then I hastened back. I
thought I heard the thing hiss at me from high above as I turned away. A large
squirrel, maybe. Perhaps under the shadow of the Unnamed some of the beasts of
Mirkwood are wandering hither to our woods. They have black squirrels there, 'tis
said.'
 'Perhaps,' said Faramir. 'But that would be an ill omen, if it were so. We do not
want the escapes of Mirkwood in Ithilien.' Sam fancied that he gave a swift glance
towards the hobbits as he spoke; but Sam said nothing. For a while he and Frodo lay
back and watched the torchlight, and the men moving to and fro speaking in hushed
voices. Then suddenly Frodo fell asleep.
 Sam struggled with himself, arguing this way and that. 'He may be all right,' he
thought, 'and then he may not. Fair speech may hide a foul heart.' He yawned. 'I
could sleep for a week, and I'd be better for it. And what can I do, if I do keep awake,
me all alone, and all these great Men about? Nothing, Sam Gamgee; but you've got
to keep awake all the same.' And somehow he managed it. The light faded from the
 188
cave door, and the grey veil of falling water grew dim and was lost in gathering
shadow. Always the sound of the water went on, never changing its note, morning or
evening or night. It murmured and whispered of sleep. Sam stuck his knuckles in his
eyes.
 Now more torches were being lit. A cask of wine was broached. Storage barrels
were being opened. Men were fetching water from the fall. Some were laving their
hands in basins. A wide copper bowl and a white cloth were brought to Faramir and
he washed.
 'Wake our guests,' he said, 'and take them water. It is time to eat.'
 Frodo sat up and yawned and stretched. Sam, not used to being waited on, looked
with some surprise at the tall man who bowed, holding a basin of water before him.
 'Put it on the ground, master, if you please!' he said. 'Easier for me and you.' Then
to the astonishment and amusement of the Men he plunged his head into the cold
water and splashed his neck and ears.
 'Is it the custom in your land to wash the head before supper?' said the man who
waited on the hobbits.
 'No, before breakfast,' said Sam. 'But if you're short of sleep cold water on the
neck's like rain on a wilted lettuce. There! Now I can keep awake long enough to eat
a bit.'
 They were led then to seats beside Faramir: barrels covered with pelts and high
enough above the benches of the Men for their convenience. Before they ate,
Faramir and all his men turned and faced west in a moment of silence. Faramir
signed to Frodo and Sam that they should do likewise.
 'So we always do,' he said, as they sat down, 'we look towards Numenor that was,
and beyond to Elvenhome that is, and to that which is beyond Elvenhome and will
ever be. Have you no such custom at meat?'
 'No,' said Frodo, feeling strangely rustic and untutored. 'But if we are guests, we
bow to our host, and after we have eaten we rise and thank him.'
 'That we do also,' said Faramir.
 After so long journeying and camping, and days spent in the lonely wild, the
evening meal seemed a feast to the hobbits: to drink pale yellow wine, cool and
fragrant, and eat bread and butter, and salted meats, and dried fruits, and good red
cheese, with clean hands and clean knives and plates. Neither Frodo nor Sam
refused anything that was offered, nor a second, nor indeed a third helping. The wine
coursed in their veins and tired limbs, and they felt glad and easy of heart as they
had not done since they left the land of Lorien.
 When all was done Faramir led them to a recess at the back of the cave, partly
screened by curtains; and a chair and two stools were brought there. A little
earthenware lamp burned in a niche.
 'You may soon desire to sleep,' he said, 'and especially good Samwise, who would
not close his eyes before he ate – whether for fear of blunting the edge of a noble
hunger, or for fear of me, I do not know. But it is not good to sleep too soon after
meat, and that following a fast. Let us talk a while. On your journey from Rivendell
there must have been many things to tell. And you, too, would perhaps wish to learn
something of us and the lands where you now are. Tell me of Boromir my brother,
and of old Mithrandir, and of the fair people of Lothlorien.'
 Frodo no longer felt sleepy and he was willing to talk. But though the food and wine
had put him at his ease, he had not lost all his caution. Sam was beaming and
humming to himself, but when Frodo spoke he was at first content to listen, only
occasionally venturing to make an exclamation of agreement.
 189
 Frodo told many tales, yet always he steered the matter away from the quest of the
Company and from the Ring, enlarging rather on the valiant part Boromir had played
in all their adventures: with the wolves of the wild, in the snows under Caradhras,
and in the mines of Moria where Gandalf fell. Faramir was most moved by the story
of the fight on the bridge.
 'It must have irked Boromir to run from Orcs,' he said, 'or even from the fell thing
you name, the Balrog – even though he was the last to leave.'
 'He was the last,' said Frodo, 'but Aragorn was forced to lead us. He alone knew
the way after Gandalf's fall. But had there not been us lesser folk to care for, I do not
think that either he or Boromir would have fled.'
 'Maybe, it would have been better had Boromir fallen there with Mithrandir,' said
Faramir, 'and not gone on to the fate that waited above the falls of Rauros.'
 'Maybe. But tell me now of your own fortunes,' said Frodo, turning the matter aside
once again. 'For I would learn more of Minas Ithil and Osgiliath, and Minas Tirith the
long-enduring. What hope have you for that city in your long war?'
 'What hope have we?' said Faramir. 'It is long since we had any hope. The sword
of Elendil, if it returns indeed, may rekindle it, but I do not think that it will do more
than put off the evil day, unless other help unlooked-for also comes, from Elves or
Men. For the Enemy increases and we decrease. We are a failing people, a
springless autumn.
 'The Men of Numenor were settled far and wide on the shores and seaward
regions of the Great Lands, but for the most part they fell into evils and follies. Many
became enamoured of the Darkness and the black arts; some were given over
wholly to idleness and ease, and some fought among themselves, until they were
conquered in their weakness by the wild men.
 'It is not said that evil arts were ever practised in Gondor, or that the Nameless
One was ever named in honour there; and the old wisdom and beauty brought out of
the West remained long in the realm of the sons of Elendil the Fair, and they linger
there still. Yet even so it was Gondor that brought about its own decay, falling by
degrees into dotage, and thinking that the Enemy was asleep, who was only
banished not destroyed.
 'Death was ever present, because the Numenoreans still, as they had in their old
kingdom, and so lost it, hungered after endless life unchanging. Kings made tombs
more splendid than houses of the living, and counted old names in the rolls of their
descent dearer than the names of sons. Childless lords sat in aged halls musing on
heraldry; in secret chambers withered men compounded strong elixirs, or in high
cold towers asked questions of the stars. And the last king of the line of Anarion had
no heir.
 'But the stewards were wiser and more fortunate. Wiser, for they recruited the
strength of our people from the sturdy folk of the sea-coast, and from the hardy
mountaineers of Ered Nimrais. And they made a truce with the proud peoples of the
North, who often had assailed us, men of fierce valour, but our kin from afar off,
unlike the wild Easterlings or the cruel Haradrim.
 'So it came to pass in the days of Cirion the Twelfth Steward (and my father is the
sit and twentieth) that they rode to our aid and at the great Field of Celebrant they
destroyed our enemies that had seized our northern provinces. These are the
Rohirrim, as we name them, masters of horses, and we ceded to them the fields of
Calenardhon that are since called Rohan; for that province had long been sparsely
peopled. And they became our allies, and have ever proved true to us, aiding us at
need, and guarding our northern marches and the Gap of Rohan.
 190
 'Of our lore and manners they have learned what they would, and their lords speak
our speech at need; yet for the most part they hold by the ways of their own fathers
and to their own memories, and they speak among themselves their own North
tongue. And we love them: tall men and fair women, valiant both alike, goldenhaired, bright-eyed, and
strong; they remind us of the youth of Men, as they were in
the Elder Days. Indeed it is said by our lore-masters that they have from of old this
affinity with us that they are come from those same Three Houses of Men as were
the Numenoreans in their beginning not from Hador the Goldenhaired, the Elf-friend,
maybe, yet from such of his sons and people as went not over Sea into the West,
refusing the call.
 'For so we reckon Men in our lore, calling them the High, or Men of the West,
which were Numenoreans; and the Middle Peoples, Men of the Twilight, such as are
the Rohirrim and their kin that dwell still far in the North; and the Wild, the Men of
Darkness.
 'Yet now, if the Rohirrim are grown in some ways more like to us, enhanced in arts
and gentleness, we too have become more like to them, and can scarce claim any
longer the title High. We are become Middle Men, of the Twilight, but with memory of
other things. For as the Rohirrim do, we now love war and valour as things good in
themselves, both a sport and an end; and though we still hold that a warrior should
have more skills and knowledge than only the craft of weapons and slaying, we
esteem a warrior, nonetheless, above men of other crafts. Such is the need of our
days. So even was my brother, Boromir: a man of prowess, and for that he was
accounted the best man in Gondor. And very valiant indeed he was: no heir of Minas
Tirith has for long years been so hardy in toil, so onward into battle, or blown a
mightier note on the Great Horn.' Faramir sighed and fell silent for a while.
 'You don't say much in all your tales about the Elves, sir,' said Sam, suddenly
plucking up courage. He had noted that Faramir seemed to refer to Elves with
reverence, and this even more than his courtesy, and his food and wine, had won
Sam's respect and quieted his suspicions.
 'No indeed, Master Samwise,' said Faramir, 'for I am not learned in Elven-lore. But
there you touch upon another point in which we have changed, declining from
Numenor to Middle-earth. For as you may know, if Mithrandir was your companion
and you have spoken with Elrond, the Edain, the Fathers of the Numenoreans,
fought beside the Elves in the first wars, and were rewarded by the gift of the
kingdom in the midst of the Sea, within sight of Elvenhome. But in Middle-earth Men
and Elves became estranged in the days of darkness, by the arts of the Enemy, and
by the slow changes of time in which each kind walked further down their sundered
roads. Men now fear and misdoubt the Elves, and yet know little of them. And we of
Gondor grow like other Men, like the men of Rohan; for even they, who are the foes
of the Dark Lord, shun the Elves and speak of the Golden Wood with dread.
 'Yet there are among us still some who have dealings with the Elves when they
may, and ever and anon one will go in secret to Lorien, seldom to return. Not I. For I
deem it perilous now for mortal man wilfully to seek out the Elder People. Yet I envy
you that have spoken with the White Lady.'
 'The Lady of Lorien! Galadriel!' cried Sam. 'You should see her indeed you should,
sir. I am only a hobbit, and gardening's my job at home, sir, if you understand me,
and I'm not much good at poetry – not at making it: a bit of a comic rhyme, perhaps,
now and again, you know, but not real poetry – so I can't tell you what I mean. It
ought to be sung. You'd have to get Strider, Aragorn that is, or old Mr. Bilbo, for that.
But I wish I could make a song about her. Beautiful she is, sir! Lovely! Sometimes
 191
like a great tree in flower, sometimes like a white daffadowndilly, small and slender
like. Hard as diamonds, soft as moonlight. Warm as sunlight, cold as frost in the
stars. Proud and far-off as a snow-mountain, and as merry as any lass I ever saw
with daisies in her hair in springtime. But that's a lot o' nonsense, and all wide of my
mark.'
 'Then she must be lovely indeed,' said Faramir. 'Perilously fair.'
 'I don't know about perilous,' said Sam. 'It strikes me that folk takes their peril with
them into Lorien, and finds it there because they've brought it. But perhaps you could
call her perilous, because she's so strong in herself. You, you could dash yourself to
pieces on her, like a ship on a rock; or drownd yourself, like a hobbit in a river. But
neither rock nor river would be to blame. Now Boro –' He stopped and went red in
the face.
 'Yes? Now Boromir you would say?' said Faramir. 'What would you say? He took
his peril with him?'
 'Yes sir, begging your pardon, and a fine man as your brother was if I may say so.
But you've been warm on the scent all along. Now I watched Boromir and listened to
him, from Rivendell all down the road – looking after my master, as you'll
understand, and not meaning any harm to Boromir – and it's my opinion that in
Lorien he first saw clearly what I guessed sooner: what he wanted. From the
moment he first saw it he wanted the Enemy's Ring!'
 'Sam!' cried Frodo aghast. He had fallen deep into his own thoughts for a while,
and came out of them suddenly and too late.
 'Save me!' said Sam turning white, and then flushing scarlet. 'There I go again!
When ever you open your big mouth you put your foot in it the Gaffer used to say to
me, and right enough. O dear, O dear!
 'Now look here, sir!' He turned, facing up to Faramir with all the courage that he
could muster. 'Don't you go taking advantage of my master because his servant's no
better than a fool. You've spoken very handsome all along, put me off my guard,
talking of Elves and all. But handsome is as handsome does we say. Now's a
chance to show your quality.'
 'So it seems,' said Faramir, slowly and very softly, with a strange smile. 'So that is
the answer to all the riddles! The One Ring that was thought to have perished from
the world. And Boromir tried to take it by force? And you escaped? And ran all the
way – to me! And here in the wild I have you: two halflings, and a host of men at my
call, and the Ring of Rings. A pretty stroke of fortune! A chance for Faramir, Captain
of Gondor, to show his quality! Ha!' He stood up, very tall and stern, his grey eyes
glinting.
 Frodo and Sam sprang from their stools and set themselves side by side with their
backs to the wall, fumbling for their sword-hilts. There was a silence. All the men in
the cave stopped talking and looked towards them in wonder. But Faramir sat down
again in his chair and began to laugh quietly, and then suddenly became grave
again.
 'Alas for Boromir! It was too sore a trial!' he said. 'How you have increased my
sorrow, you two strange wanderers from a far country, bearing the peril of Men! But
you are less judges of Men than I of Halflings. We are truth-speakers, we men of
Gondor. We boast seldom, and then perform, or die in the attempt. Not if I found it on
the highway would I take it I said. Even if I were such a man as to desire this thing,
and even though I knew not clearly what this thing was when I spoke, still I should
take those words as a vow, and be held by them.
 'But I am not such a man. Or I am wise enough to know that there are some perils
 192
from which a man must flee. Sit at peace! And be comforted, Samwise. If you seem
to have stumbled, think that it was fated to be so. Your heart is shrewd as well as
faithful, and saw clearer than your eyes. For strange though it may seem, it was safe
to declare this to me. It may even help the master that you love. It shall turn to his
good, if it is in my power. So be comforted. But do not even name this thing again
aloud. Once is enough.'
 The hobbits came back to their seats and sat very quiet. Men turned back to their
drink and their talk, perceiving that their captain had had some jest or other with the
little guests, and that it was over.
 'Well, Frodo, now at last we understand one another,' said Faramir. 'If you took this
thing on yourself, unwilling, at others' asking, then you have pity and honour from
me. And I marvel at you: to keep it hid and not to use it. You are a new people and a
new world to me. Are all your kin of like sort? Your land must be a realm of peace
and content, and there must gardeners be in high honour.'
 'Not all is well there,' said Frodo, 'but certainly gardeners are honoured.'
 'But folk must grow weary there, even in their gardens, as do all things under the
Sun of this world. And you are far from home and wayworn. No more tonight. Sleep,
both of you – in peace, if you can. Fear not! I do not wish to see it, or touch it, or
know more of it than I know (which is enough), lest peril perchance waylay me and I
fall lower in the test than Frodo son of Drogo. Go now to rest – but first tell me only, if
you will, whither you wish to go, and what to do. For I must watch, and wait, and
think. Time passes. In the morning we must each go swiftly on the ways appointed to
us.'
 Frodo had felt himself trembling as the first shock of fear passed. Now a great
weariness came down on him like a cloud. He could dissemble and resist no longer.
 'I was going to find a way into Mordor,' he said faintly. 'I was going to Gorgoroth. I
must find the Mountain of Fire and cast the thing into the gulf of Doom. Gandalf said
so. I do not think I shall ever get there.'
 Faramir stared at him for a moment in grave astonishment. Then suddenly he
caught him as he swayed, and lifting him gently, carried him to the bed and laid him
there, and covered him warmly. At once he fell into a deep sleep.
 Another bed was set beside him for his servant. Sam hesitated for a moment, then
bowing very low: 'Good night, Captain, my lord,' he said. 'You took the chance, sir.'
 'Did I so?' said Faramir.
 'Yes sir, and showed your quality: the very highest.'
 Faramir smiled. 'A pert servant, Master Samwise. But nay: the praise of the
praiseworthy is above all rewards. Yet there was naught in this to praise. I had no
lure or desire to do other than I have done.'
 'Ah well, sir,' said Sam, 'you said my master had an elvish air and that was good
and true. But I can say this: you have an air too, sir, that reminds me of, of – well,
Gandalf, of wizards.
 'Maybe,' said Faramir. 'Maybe you discern from far away the air of Numenor. Good
night!'
Chapter 6
The Forbidden Pool
 Frodo woke to find Faramir bending over him. For a second old fears seized him
and he sat up and shrank away.
 'There is nothing to fear,' said Faramir.
 193
 'Is it morning already?' said Frodo yawning.
 'Not yet, but night is drawing to an end, and the full moon is setting. Will you come
and see it? Also there is a matter on which I desire your counsel. I am sorry to rouse
you from sleep, but will you come?'
 'I will,' said Frodo, rising and shivering a little as he left the warm blanket and pelts.
It seemed cold in the fireless cave. The noise of the water was loud in the stillness.
He put on his cloak and followed Faramir.
 Sam, waking suddenly by some instinct of watchfulness, saw first his master's
empty bed and leapt to his feet. Then he saw two dark figures, Frodo and a man,
framed against the archway, which was now filled with a pale white light. He hurried
after them, past rows of men sleeping on mattresses along the wall. As he went by
the cave-mouth he saw that the Curtain was now become a dazzling veil of silk and
pearls and silver thread: melting icicles of moonlight. But he did not pause to admire
it, and turning aside he followed his master through the narrow doorway in the wall of
the cave.
 They went first along a black passage, then up many wet steps, and so came to a
small flat landing cut in the stone and lit by the pale sky, gleaming high above
through a long deep shaft. From here two flights of steps led: one going on, as it
seemed, up on to the high bank of the stream; the other turning away to the left. This
they followed. It wound its way up like a turret-stair.
 At last they came out of the stony darkness and looked about. They were on a
wide flat rock without rail or parapet. At their right, eastwards, the torrent fell,
splashing over many terraces, and then, pouring down a steep race, it filled a
smooth-hewn channel with a dark force of water flecked with foam, and curling and
rushing almost at their feet it plunged sheer over the edge that yawned upon their
left. A man stood there, near the brink, silent, gazing down.
 Frodo turned to watch the sleek necks of the water as they curved and dived. Then
he lifted his eyes and gazed far away. The world was quiet and cold, as if dawn were
near. Far off in the West the full moon was sinking, round and white. Pale mists
shimmered in the great vale below: a wide gulf of silver fume, beneath which rolled
the cool night-waters of the Anduin. A black darkness loomed beyond, and in it
glinted, here and there, cold, sharp, remote, white as the teeth of ghosts, the peaks
of Ered Nimrais, the White Mountains of the Realm of Gondor, tipped with
everlasting snow.
 For a while Frodo stood there on the high stone, and a shiver ran through him,
wondering if anywhere in the vastness of the night-lands his old companions walked
or slept, or lay dead shrouded in mist. Why was he brought here out of forgetful
sleep?
 Sam was eager for an answer to the same question and could not refrain himself
from muttering, for his master's ear alone as he thought: 'It's a fine view, no doubt,
Mr. Frodo, but chilly to the heart, not to mention the bones! What's going on?'
 Faramir heard and answered. 'Moonset over Gondor. Fair Ithil as he goes from
Middle-earth, glances upon the white locks of old Mindolluin. It is worth a few
shivers. But that is not what I brought you to see – though as for you, Samwise, you
were not brought, and do but pay the penalty of your watchfulness. A draught of wine
shall amend it. Come, look now!'
 He stepped up beside the silent sentinel on the dark edge, and Frodo followed.
Sam hung back. He already felt insecure enough on this high wet platform. Faramir
and Frodo looked down. Far below them they saw the white waters pour into a
foaming bowl, and then swirl darkly about a deep oval basin in the rocks, until they
 194
found their way out again through a narrow gate, and flowed away, fuming and
chattering, into calmer and more level reaches. The moonlight still slanted down to
the fall's foot and gleamed on the ripples of the basin. Presently Frodo was aware of
a small dark thing on the near bank, but even as he looked at it, it dived and
vanished just beyond the boil and bubble of the fall, cleaving the black water as
neatly as an arrow or an edgewise stone.
 Faramir turned to the man at his side. 'Now what would you say that it is, Anborn?
A squirrel, or a kingfisher? Are there black kingfishers in the night-pools of
Mirkwood?'
 ''Tis not a bird, whatever else it be,' answered Anborn. 'It has four limbs and dives
manwise; a pretty mastery of the craft it shows, too. What is it at? Seeking a way up
behind the Curtain to our hidings? It seems we are discovered at last. I have my bow
here, and I have posted other archers, nigh as good marksmen as myself, on either
bank. We wait only for your command to shoot, Captain.'
 'Shall we shoot?' said Faramir, turning quickly to Frodo.
 Frodo did not answer for a moment. Then 'No!' he said. 'No! I beg you not to.' If
Sam had dared, he would have said 'Yes,' quicker and louder. He could not see, but
he guessed well enough from their words what they were looking at.
 'You know, then, what this thing is?' said Faramir. 'Come, now you have seen, tell
me why it should be spared. In all our words together you have not once spoken of
your gangrel companion, and I let him be for the time. He could wait till he was
caught and brought before me. I sent my keenest huntsmen to seek him, but he
slipped them, and they had no sight of him till now, save Anborn here, once at dusk
yesterevening. But now he has done worse trespass than only to go coney-snaring
in the uplands: he has dared to come to Henneth Annun, and his life is forfeit. I
marvel at the creature: so secret and so sly as he is, to come sporting in the pool
before our very window. Does he think that men sleep without watch all night? Why
does he so?'
 'There are two answers, I think,' said Frodo. 'For one thing, he knows little of Men,
and sly though he is, your refuge is so hidden that perhaps he does not know that
Men are concealed here. For another, I think he is allured here by a mastering
desire, stronger than his caution.'
 'He is lured here, you say?' said Faramir in a low voice. 'Can he, does he then
know of your burden?'
 'Indeed yes. He bore it himself for many years.'
 'He bore it?' said Faramir, breathing sharply in his wonder. 'This matter winds itself
ever in new riddles. Then he is pursuing it?'
 'Maybe. It is precious to him. But I did not speak of that.'
 'What then does the creature seek?'
 'Fish,' said Frodo. 'Look!'
 They peered down at the dark pool. A little black head appeared at the far end of
the basin, just out of the deep shadow of the rocks. There was a brief silver glint, and
a swirl of tiny ripples. It swam to the side, and then with marvellous agility a froglike
figure climbed out of the water and up the bank. At once it sat down and began to
gnaw at the small silver thing that glittered as it turned: the last rays of the moon
were now falling behind the stony wall at the pool's end.
 Faramir laughed softly. 'Fish!' he said. 'It is a less perilous hunger. Or maybe not:
fish from the pool of Henneth Annun may cost him all he has to give.'
 'Now I have him at the arrow-point,' said Anborn. 'Shall I not shoot, Captain? For
coming unbidden to this place death is our law.'
 195
 'Wait, Anborn,' said Faramir. 'This is a harder matter than it seems. What have you
to say now, Frodo? Why should we spare?'
 'The creature is wretched and hungry,' said Frodo, 'and unaware of his danger.
And Gandalf, your Mithrandir, he would have bidden you not to slay him for that
reason, and for others. He forbade the Elves to do so. I do not know clearly why, and
of what I guess I cannot speak openly out here. But this creature is in some way
bound up with my errand. Until you found us and took us, he was my guide.'
 'Your guide!' said Faramir. 'The matter becomes ever stranger. I would do much for
you, Frodo, but this I cannot grant: to let this sly wanderer go free at his own will from
here, to join you later if it please him, or to be caught by Orcs and tell all he knows
under threat of pain. He must be slain or taken. Slain, if he be not taken very swiftly.
But how can this slippery thing of many guises be caught, save by a feathered
shaft?'
 'Let me go down quietly to him,' said Frodo. 'You may keep your bows bent, and
shoot me at least, if I fail. I shall not run away.'
 'Go then and be swift!' said Faramir. 'If he comes off alive, he should be your
faithful servant for the rest of his unhappy days. Lead Frodo down to the bank,
Anborn, and go softly. The thing has a nose and ears. Give me your bow.'
 Anborn grunted and led the way down the winding stair to the landing, and then up
the other stair, until at last they came to a narrow opening shrouded with thick
bushes. Passing silently through, Frodo found himself on the top of the southern
bank above the pool. It was now dark and the falls were pale and grey, reflecting
only the lingering moonlight of the western sky. He could not see Gollum. He went
forward a short way and Anborn came softly behind him.
 'Go on!' he breathed in Frodo's ear. 'Have a care to your right. If you fall in the pool,
then no one but your fishing friend can help you. And forget not that there are
bowmen near at hand, though you may not see them.'
 Frodo crept forward, using his hands Gollum-like to feel his way and to steady
himself. The rocks were for the most part flat and smooth but slippery. He halted
listening. At first he could hear no sound but the unceasing rush of the fall behind
him. Then presently he heard, not far ahead, a hissing murmur.
 'Fissh, nice fissh. White Face has vanished, my precious, at last, yes. Now we can
eat fish in peace. No, not in peace, precious. For Precious is lost; yes, lost. Dirty
hobbits, nasty hobbits. Gone and left us, gollum; and Precious is gone. Only poor
Smeagol all alone. No Precious. Nasty Men, they'll take it, steal my Precious.
Thieves. We hates them. Fissh, nice fissh: Makes us strong. Makes eyes bright,
fingers tight, yes. Throttle them, precious. Throttle them all, yes, if we gets chances.
Nice fissh. Nice fissh!'
 So it went on, almost as unceasing as the waterfall, only interrupted by a faint
noise of slavering and gurgling. Frodo shivered, listening with pity and disgust. He
wished it would stop, and that he never need hear that voice again. Anborn was not
far behind. He could creep back and ask him to get the huntsmen to shoot. They
would probably get close enough, while Gollum was gorging and off his guard. Only
one true shot, and Frodo would be rid of the miserable voice for ever. But no, Gollum
had a claim on him now. The servant has a claim on the master for service, even
service in fear. They would have foundered in the Dead Marshes but for Gollum.
Frodo knew, too, somehow, quite clearly that Gandalf would not have wished it.
 'Smeagol!' he said softly.
 'Fissh, nice fissh,' said the voice.
 'Smeagol!' he said, a little louder. The voice stopped.
 196
 'Smeagol, Master has come to look for you. Master is here. Come, Smeagol!'
There was no answer but a soft hiss, as of intaken breath.
 'Come, Smeagol!' said Frodo. 'We are in danger. Men will kill you, if they find you
here. Come quickly, if you wish to escape death. Come to Master!'
 'No!' said the voice. 'Not nice Master. Leaves poor Smeagol and goes with new
friends. Master can wait. Smeagol hasn't finished.'
 'There's no time,' said Frodo. 'Bring fish with you. Come!'
 'No! Must finish fish.'
 'Smeagol!' said Frodo desperately. 'Precious will be angry. I shall take Precious,
and I shall say: make him swallow the bones and choke. Never taste fish again.
Come, Precious is waiting!'
 There was a sharp hiss. Presently out of the darkness Gollum came crawling on all
fours, like an erring dog called to heel. He had a half-eaten fish in his mouth and
another in his hand. He came close to Frodo, almost nose to nose, and sniffed at
him. His pale eyes were shining. Then he took the fish out of his mouth and stood
up.
 'Nice Master!' he whispered. 'Nice hobbit, come back to poor Smeagol. Good
Smeagol comes. Now let's go, go quickly, yes. Through the trees, while the Faces
are dark. Yes, come let's go!'
 'Yes, we'll go soon,' said Frodo. 'But not at once. I will go with you as I promised. I
promise again. But not now. You are not safe yet. I will save you, but you must trust
me.'
 'We must trust Master?' said Gollum doubtfully. 'Why? Why not go at once? Where
is the other one, the cross rude hobbit? Where is he?'
 'Away up there,' said Frodo, pointing to the waterfall. 'I am not going without him.
We must go back to him.' His heart sank. This was too much like trickery. He did not
really fear that Faramir would allow Gollum to be killed, but he would probably make
him prisoner and bind him; and certainly what Frodo did would seem a treachery to
the poor treacherous creature. It would probably be impossible ever to make him
understand or believe that Frodo had saved his life in the only way he could. What
else could he do? – to keep faith, as near as might be, with both sides. 'Come!' he
said. 'Or the Precious will be angry. We are going back now, up the stream. Go on,
go on, you go in front!'
 Gollum crawled along close to the brink for a little way, snuffling and suspicious.
Presently he stopped and raised his head. 'Something's there!' he said. 'Not a
hobbit.' Suddenly he turned back. A green light was flickering in his bulging eyes.
'Masster, masster!' he hissed. 'Wicked! Tricksy! False!' He spat and stretched out his
long arms with white snapping fingers.
 At that moment the great black shape of Anborn loomed up behind him and came
down on him. A large strong hand took him in the nape of the neck and pinned him.
He twisted round like lightning, all wet and slimy as he was, wriggling like an eel,
biting and scratching like a cat. But two more men came up out of the shadows.
 'Hold still!' said one. 'Or we'll stick you as full of pins as a hedgehog. Hold still!'
 Gollum went limp, and began to whine and weep. They tied him, none too gently.
 'Easy, easy!' said Frodo. 'He has no strength to match you. Don't hurt him, if you
can help it. He'll be quieter, if you don't. Smeagol! They won't hurt you. I'll go with
you, and you shall come to no harm. Not unless they kill me too. Trust Master!'
 Gollum turned and spat at him. The men picked him up, put a hood over his eyes,
and carried him off.
 Frodo followed them, feeling very wretched. They went through the opening behind
 197
the bushes, and back, down the stairs and passages, into the cave. Two or three
torches had been lit. Men were stirring. Sam was there, and he gave a queer look at
the limp bundle that the men carried. 'Got him?' he said to Frodo.
 'Yes. Well no, I didn't get him. He came to me, because he trusted me at first, I'm
afraid. I did not want him tied up like this. I hope it will be all right; but I hate the
whole business.'
 'So do I,' said Sam. 'And nothing will ever be all right where that piece of misery is.'
 A man came and beckoned to the hobbits, and took them to the recess at the back
of the cave. Faramir was sitting there in his chair, and the lamp had been rekindled
in its niche above his head. He signed to them to sit down on the stools beside him.
'Bring wine for the guests,' he said. 'And bring the prisoner to me.'
 The wine was brought, and then Anborn came carrying Gollum. He removed the
cover from Gollum's head and set him on his feet standing behind him to support
him. Gollum blinked, hooding the malice of his eyes with their heavy pale lids. A very
miserable creature he looked, dripping and dank, smelling of fish (he still clutched
one in his hand); his sparse locks were hanging like rank weed over his bony brows,
his nose was snivelling.
 'Loose us! Loose us!' he said. 'The cord hurts us, yes it does, it hurts us, and we've
done nothing.'
 'Nothing?' said Faramir, looking at the wretched creature with a keen glance, but
without any expression in his face either of anger, or pity, or wonder. 'Nothing? Have
you never done anything worthy of binding or of worse punishment? However, that is
not for me to judge, happily. But tonight you have come where it is death to come.
The fish of this pool are dearly bought.'
 Gollum dropped the fish from his hand. 'Don't want fish,' he said.
 'The price is not set on the fish,' said Faramir. 'Only to come here and look on the
pool bears the penalty of death. I have spared you so far at the prayer of Frodo here,
who says that of him at least you have deserved some thanks. But you must also
satisfy me. What is your name? Whence do you come? And whither do you go?
What is your business?'
 'We are lost, lost,' said Gollum. 'No name, no business, no Precious, nothing. Only
empty. Only hungry; yes, we are hungry. A few little fishes, nasty bony little fishes,
for a poor creature, and they say death. So wise they are; so just, so very just.'
 'Not very wise,' said Faramir. 'But just: yes perhaps, as just as our little wisdom
allows. Unloose him Frodo!' Faramir took a small nail-knife from his belt and handed
it to Frodo. Gollum misunderstanding the gesture, squealed and fell down.
 'Now, Smeagol!' said Frodo. 'You must trust me. I will not desert you. Answer
truthfully, if you can. It will do you good not harm.' He cut the cords on Gollum's
wrists and ankles and raised him to his feet.
 'Come hither!' said Faramir. 'Look at me! Do you know the name of this place?
Have you been here before?'
 Slowly Gollum raised his eyes and looked unwillingly into Faramir's. All light went
out of them, and they stared bleak and pale for a moment into the clear unwavering
eyes of the man of Gondor. There was a still silence. Then Gollum dropped his head
and shrank down, until he was squatting on the floor, shivering. 'We doesn't know
and we doesn't want to know,' he whimpered. 'Never came here; never come again.'
 'There are locked doors and closed windows in your mind, and dark rooms behind
them,' said Faramir. 'But in this I judge that you speak the truth. It is well for you.
What oath will you swear never to return; and never to lead any living creature hither
by word or sign?'
 198
 'Master knows,' said Gollum with a sidelong glance at Frodo. 'Yes, he knows. We
will promise Master, if he saves us. We'll promise to It, yes.' He crawled to Frodo's
feet. 'Save us, nice Master!' he whined. 'Smeagol promises to Precious, promises
faithfully. Never come again, never speak, no never! No, precious, no!'
 'Are you satisfied?' said Faramir.
 'Yes,' said Frodo. 'At least, you must either accept this promise or carry out your
law. You will get no more. But I promised that if he came to me, he should not be
harmed. And I would not be proved faithless.'
 Faramir sat for a moment in thought. 'Very good,' he said at last. 'I surrender you to
your master, to Frodo son of Drogo. Let him declare what he will do with you!'
 'But, Lord Faramir,' said Frodo bowing, 'you have not yet declared your will
concerning the said Frodo, and until that is made known, he cannot shape his plans
for himself or his companions. Your judgement was postponed until the morning; but
that is now at hand.'
 'Then I will declare my doom,' said Faramir. 'As for you, Frodo, in so far as lies in
me under higher authority, I declare you free in the realm of, Gondor to the furthest
of its ancient bounds; save only that neither you nor any that go with you have leave
to come to this place unbidden. This doom shall stand for a year and a day, and then
cease, unless you shall before that term come to Minas Tirith and present yourself to
the Lord and Steward of the City. Then I will entreat him to confirm what I have done
and to make it lifelong. In the meantime, whomsoever you take under your protection
shall be under my protection and under the shield of Gondor. Are you answered?'
 Frodo bowed low. 'I am answered,' he said, 'and I place myself at your service, if
that is of any worth to one so high and honourable.'
 'It is of great worth,' said Faramir. 'And now, do you take this creature, this
Smeagol, under your protection?'
 'I do take Smeagol under my protection,' said Frodo. Sam sighed audibly; and not
at the courtesies, of which, as any hobbit would, he thoroughly approved. Indeed in
the Shire such a matter would have required a great many more words and bows.
 'Then I say to you,' said Faramir, turning to Gollum, 'you are under doom of death;
but while you walk with Frodo you are safe for our part. Yet if ever you be found by
any man of Gondor astray without him, the doom shall fall. And may death find you
swiftly, within Gondor or without, if you do not well serve him. Now answer me:
whither would you go? You were his guide, he says. Whither were you leading him?'
Gollum made no reply.
 'This I will not have secret,' said Faramir. 'Answer me, or I will reverse my
judgement!' Still Gollum did not answer.
 'I will answer for him,' said Frodo. 'He brought me to the Black Gate, as I asked;
but it was impassable.'
 'There is no open gate into the Nameless Land,' said Faramir.
 'Seeing this, we turned aside and came by the Southward road,' Frodo continued,
'for he said that there is, or there may be, a path near to Minas Ithil.'
 'Minas Morgul,' said Faramir.
 'I do not know clearly,' said Frodo, 'but the path climbs, I think, up into the
mountains on the northern side of that vale where the old city stands. It goes up to a
high cleft and so down to – that which is beyond.'
 'Do you know the name of that high pass?' said Faramir.
 'No,' said Frodo.
 'It is called Cirith Ungol.' Gollum hissed sharply and began muttering to himself. 'Is
not that its name?' said Faramir turning to him.
 199
 'No!' said Gollum, and then he squealed, as if something had stabbed him. 'Yes,
yes, we heard the name once. But what does the name matter to us? Master says
he must get in. So we must try some way. There is no other way to try, no.'
 'No other way?' said Faramir. 'How do you know that? And who has explored all
the confines of that dark realm?' He looked long and thoughtfully at Gollum.
Presently he spoke again. 'Take this creature away, Anborn. Treat him gently, but
watch him. And do not you, Smeagol, try to dive into the falls. The rocks have such
teeth there as would slay you before your time. Leave us now and take your fish!'
 Anborn went out and Gollum went cringing before him. The curtain was drawn
across the recess.
 'Frodo, I think you do very unwisely in this,' said Faramir. 'I do not think you should
go with this creature. It is wicked.'
 'No, not altogether wicked,' said Frodo.
 'Not wholly, perhaps,' said Faramir; 'but malice eats it like a canker, and the evil is
growing. He will lead you to no good. If you will part with him, I will give him safeconduct and guidance
to any point on the borders of Gondor that he may name.'
 'He would not take it,' said Frodo. 'He would follow after me as he long has done.
And I have promised many times to take him under my protection and to go where
he led. You would not ask me to break faith with him?'
 'No,' said Faramir. 'But my heart would. For it seems less evil to counsel another
man to break troth than to do so oneself, especially if one sees a friend bound
unwitting to his own harm. But no – if he will go with you, you must now endure him.
But I do not think you are holden to go to Cirith Ungol, of which he has told you less
than he knows. That much I perceived clearly in his mind. Do not go to Cirith Ungol!'
 'Where then shall I go?' said Frodo. 'Back to the Black Gate and deliver myself up
to the guard? What do you know against this place that makes its name so dreadful?'
 'Nothing certain,' said Faramir. 'We of Gondor do not ever pass east of the Road in
these days, and none of us younger men has ever done so, nor has any of us set
foot upon the Mountains of Shadow. Of them we know only old report and the
rumour of bygone days. But there is some dark terror that dwells in the passes
above Minas Morgul. If Cirith Ungol is named, old men and masters of lore will
blanch and fall silent.
 'The valley of Minas Morgul passed into evil very long ago, and it was a menace
and a dread while the banished Enemy dwelt yet far away, and Ithilien was still for
the most part in our keeping. As you know, that city was once a strong place, proud
and fair, Minas Ithil, the twin sister of our own city. But it was taken by fell men whom
the Enemy in his first strength had dominated, and who wandered homeless and
masterless after his fall. It is said that their lords were men of Numenor who had
fallen into dark wickedness; to them the Enemy had given rings of power, and he
had devoured them: living ghosts they were become, terrible and evil. After his going
they took Minas Ithil and dwelt there, and they filled it, and all the valley about, with
decay: it seemed empty and was not so, for a shapeless fear lived within the ruined
walls. Nine Lords there were, and after the return of their Master, which they aided
and prepared in secret, they grew strong again. Then the Nine Riders issued forth
from the gates of horror, and we could not withstand them. Do not approach their
citadel. You will be espied. It is a place of sleepless malice, full of lidless eyes. Do
not go that way!'
 'But where else will you direct me?' said Frodo. 'You cannot yourself, you say,
guide me to the mountains, nor over them. But over the mountains I am bound, by
solemn undertaking to the Council, to find a way or perish in the seeking. And if I turn
 200
back, refusing the road in its bitter end, where then shall I go among Elves or Men?
Would you have me come to Gondor with this Thing, the Thing that drove your
brother mad with desire? What spell would it work in Minas Tirith? Shall there be two
cities of Minas Morgul, grinning at each other across a dead land filled with
rottenness?'
 'I would not have it so,' said Faramir.
 'Then what would you have me do?'
 'I know not. Only I would not have you go to death or to torment. And I do not think
that Mithrandir would have chosen this way.'
 'Yet since he is gone, I must take such paths as I can find. And there is no time for
long searching,' said Frodo.
 'It is a hard doom and a hopeless errand,' said Faramir. 'But at the least, remember
my warning: beware of this guide, Smeagol. He has done murder before now. I read
it in him.' He sighed.
 'Well, so we meet and part, Frodo son of Drogo. You have no need of soft words: I
do not hope to see you again on any other day under this Sun. But you shall go now
with my blessing upon you, and upon all your people. Rest a little while food is
prepared for you.
 'I would gladly learn how this creeping Smeagol became possessed of the Thing of
which we speak, and how he lost it, but I will not trouble you now. If ever beyond
hope you return to the lands of the living and we retell our tales, sitting by a wall in
the sun, laughing at old grief, you shall tell me then. Until that time, or some other
time beyond the vision of the Seeing-stones of Numenor, farewell!'
 He rose and bowed low to Frodo, and drawing the curtain passed out into the
cave.
Chapter 7
Journey to the Cross-roads
 Frodo and Sam returned to their beds and lay there in silence resting for a little,
while men bestirred themselves and the business of the day began. After a while
water was brought to them, and then they were led to a table where food was set for
three. Faramir broke his fast with them. He had not slept since the battle on the day
before, yet he did not look weary.
 When they had finished they stood up. 'May no hunger trouble you on the road,'
said Faramir. 'You have little provision, but some small store of food fit for travellers I
have ordered to be stowed in your packs. You will have no lack of water as you walk
in Ithilien, but do not drink of any stream that flows from Imlad Morgul, the Valley of
Living Death. This also I must tell you. My scouts and watchers have all returned,
even some that have crept within sight of the Morannon. They all find a strange
thing. The land is empty. Nothing is on the road, and no sound of foot, or horn, or
bowstring is anywhere to be heard. A waiting silence broods above the Nameless
Land. I do not know what this portends. But the time draws swiftly to some great
conclusion. Storm is coming. Hasten while you may! If you are ready, let us go. The
Sun will soon rise above the shadow.'
 The hobbits' packs were brought to them (a little heavier than they had been), and
also two stout staves of polished wood, shod with iron, and with carven heads
through which ran plaited leathern thongs.
 'I have no fitting gifts to give you at our parting,' said Faramir; 'but take these
staves. They may be of service to those who walk or climb in the wild. The men of
 201
the White Mountains use them; though these have been cut down to your height and
newly shod. They are made of the fair tree lebethron, beloved of the woodwrights of
Gondor, and a virtue has been set upon them of finding and returning. May that
virtue not wholly fail under the Shadow into which you go!'
 The hobbits bowed low. 'Most gracious host,' said Frodo, 'it was said to me by
Elrond Halfelven that I should find friendship upon the way, secret and unlooked for.
Certainly I looked for no such friendship as you have shown. To have found it turns
evil to great good.'
 Now they made ready to depart. Gollum was brought out of some corner or hidinghole, and he seemed
better pleased with himself than he had been, though he kept
close to Frodo and avoided the glance of Faramir.
 'Your guide must be blindfolded,' said Faramir, 'but you and your servant Samwise
I release from this, if you wish.'
 Gollum squealed, and squirmed, and clutched at Frodo, when they came to bind
his eyes; and Frodo said: 'Blindfold us all three, and cover up my eyes first, and then
perhaps he will see that no harm is meant.' This was done, and they were led from
the cave of Henneth Annun. After they had passed the passages and stairs they felt
the cool morning air, fresh and sweet, about them. Still blind they went on for some
little time, up and then gently down. At last the voice of Faramir ordered them to be
uncovered.
 They stood under the boughs of the woods again. No noise of the falls could be
heard, for a long southward slope lay now between them and the ravine in which the
stream flowed. To the west they could see light through the trees, as if the world
came there to a sudden end, at a brink looking out only on to sky.
 'Here is the last parting of our ways,' said Faramir. 'If you take my counsel, you will
not turn eastward yet. Go straight on, for thus you will have the cover of the
woodland for many miles. On your west is an edge where the land falls into the great
vales, sometimes suddenly and sheer, sometimes in long hillsides. Keep near to this
edge and the skirts of the forest. In the beginning of your journey you may walk
under daylight, I think. The land dreams in a false peace, and for a while all evil is
withdrawn. Fare you well, while you may!'
 He embraced the hobbits then, after the manner of his people, stooping, and
placing his hands upon their shoulders, and kissing their foreheads. 'Go with the
good will of all good men!' he said.
 They bowed to the ground. Then he turned and without looking back he left them
and went to his two guards that stood at a little distance away. They marvelled to see
with what speed these green-clad men now moved, vanishing almost in the twinkling
of an eye. The forest where Faramir had stood seemed empty and drear, as if a
dream had passed.
 Frodo sighed and turned back southward. As if to mark his disregard of all such
courtesy, Gollum was scrabbling in the mould at the foot of a tree. 'Hungry again
already?' thought Sam. 'Well, now for it again!'
 'Have they gone at last?' said Gollum. 'Nassty wicked Men! Smeagol's neck still
hurts him, yes it does. Let's go!'
 'Yes, let us go,' said Frodo. 'But if you can only speak ill of those who showed you
mercy, keep silent!'
 'Nice Master!' said Gollum. 'Smeagol was only joking. Always forgives, he does,
yes, yes, even nice Master's little trickses. Oh yes, nice Master, nice Smeagol!'
 Frodo and Sam did not answer. Hoisting their packs and taking their staves in
hand, they passed on into the woods of Ithilien.
 202
 Twice that day they rested and took a little of the food provided by Faramir: dried
fruits and salted meat, enough for many days; and bread enough to last while it was
still fresh. Gollum ate nothing.
 The sun rose and passed overhead unseen, and began to sink, and the light
through the trees to the west grew golden; and always they walked in cool green
shadow, and all about them was silence. The birds seemed all to have flown away or
to have fallen dumb.
 Darkness came early to the silent woods, and before the fall of night they halted,
weary, for they had walked seven leagues or more from Henneth Annun. Frodo lay
and slept away the night on the deep mould beneath an ancient tree. Sam beside
him was more uneasy: he woke many times, but there was never a sign of Gollum,
who had slipped off as soon as the others had settled to rest. Whether he had slept
by himself in some hole nearby, or had wandered restlessly prowling through the
night, he did not say; but he returned with the first glimmer of light, and roused his
companions.
 'Must get up, yes they must!' he said. 'Long ways to go still, south and east.
Hobbits must make haste!'
 That day passed much as the day before had gone, except that the silence
seemed deeper; the air grew heavy, and it began to be stifling under the trees. It felt
as if thunder was brewing. Gollum often paused, sniffing the air, and then he would
mutter to himself and urge them to greater speed.
 As the third stage of their day's march drew on and afternoon waned, the forest
opened out, and the trees became larger and more scattered. Great ilexes of huge
girth stood dark and solemn in wide glades with here and there among them hoary
ash-trees, and giant oaks just putting out their brown-green buds. About them lay
long launds of green grass dappled with celandine and anemones, white and blue,
now folded for sleep; and there were acres populous with the leaves of woodland
hyacinths: already their sleek bell-stems were thrusting through the mould. No living
creature, beast or bird, was to be seen, but in these open places Gollum grew afraid,
and they walked now with caution, flitting from one long shadow to another.
 Light was fading fast when they came to the forest-end. There they sat under an
old gnarled oak that sent its roots twisting like snakes down a steep crumbling bank.
A deep dim valley lay before them. On its further side the woods gathered again,
blue and grey under the sullen evening, and marched on southwards. To the right
the Mountains of Gondor glowed, remote in the West, under a fire-flecked sky. To
the left lay darkness: the towering walls of Mordor; and out of that darkness the long
valley came, falling steeply in an ever-widening trough towards the Anduin. At its
bottom ran a hurrying stream: Frodo could hear its stony voice coming up through
the silence; and beside it on the hither side a road went winding down like a pale
ribbon, down into chill grey mists that no gleam of sunset touched. There it seemed
to Frodo that he descried far off, floating as it were on a shadowy sea, the high dim
tops and broken pinnacles of old towers forlorn and dark.
 He turned to Gollum. 'Do you know where we are?' he said.
 'Yes, Master. Dangerous places. This is the road from the Tower of the Moon,
Master, down to the ruined city by the shores of the River. The ruined city, yes, very
nasty place, full of enemies. We shouldn't have taken Men's advice. Hobbits have
come a long way out of the path. Must go east now, away up there.' He waved his
skinny arm towards the darkling mountains. 'And we can't use this road. Oh no!
Cruel peoples come this way, down from the Tower.'
 Frodo looked down on to the road. At any rate nothing was moving on it now. It
 203
appeared lonely and forsaken, running down to empty ruins in the mist. But there
was an evil feeling in the air, as if things might indeed be passing up and down that
eyes could not see. Frodo shuddered as he looked again at the distant pinnacles
now dwindling into night, and the sound of the water seemed cold and cruel: the
voice of Morgulduin, the polluted stream that flowed from the Valley of the Wraiths.
 'What shall we do?' he said. 'We have walked long and far. Shall we look for some
place in the woods behind where we can lie hidden?'
 'No good hiding in the dark,' said Gollum. 'It's in day that hobbits must hide now,
yes, in day.'
 'Oh come!' said Sam. 'We must rest for a bit, even if we get up again in the middle
of the night. There'll still be hours of dark then time enough for you to take us a long
march, if you know the way.'
 Gollum reluctantly agreed to this, and he turned back towards the trees, working
eastward for a while along the straggling edges of the wood. He would not rest on
the ground so near the evil road, and after some debate they all climbed up into the
crotch of a large holm-oak, whose thick branches springing together from the trunk
made a good hiding-place and a fairly comfortable refuge. Night fell and it grew
altogether dark under the canopy of the tree. Frodo and Sam drank a little water and
ate some bread and dried fruit, but Gollum at once curled up and went to sleep. The
hobbits did not shut their eyes.
 It must have been a little after midnight when Gollum woke up: suddenly they were
aware of his pale eyes unlidded gleaming at them. He listened and sniffed, which
seemed, as they had noticed before, his usual method of discovering the time of
night.
 'Are we rested? Have we had beautiful sleep?' he said. 'Let's go!'
 'We aren't, and we haven't,' growled Sam. 'But we'll go if we must.'
 Gollum dropped at once from the branches of the tree on to all fours, and the
hobbits followed more slowly.
 As soon as they were down they went on again with Gollum leading, eastwards, up
the dark sloping land. They could see little, for the night was now so deep that they
were hardly aware of the stems of trees before they stumbled against them. The
ground became more broken and walking was more difficult, but Gollum seemed in
no way troubled. He led them through thickets and wastes of brambles; sometimes
round the lip of a deep cleft or dark pit, sometimes down into black bush-shrouded
hollows and out again; but if ever they went a little downward, always the further
slope was longer and steeper. They were climbing steadily. At their first halt they
looked back, and they could dimly perceive the roofs of the forest they had left
behind lying like a vast dense shadow, a darker night under the dark blank sky.
There seemed to be a great blackness looming slowly out of the East, eating up the
faint blurred stars. Later the sinking moon escaped from the pursuing cloud, but it
was ringed all about with a sickly yellow glare.
 At last Gollum turned to the hobbits. 'Day soon,' he said. 'Hobbits must hurry. Not
safe to stay in the open in these places. Make haste!'
 He quickened his pace, and they followed him wearily. Soon they began to climb
up on to a great hog-back of land. For the most part it was covered with a thick
growth of gorse and whortleberry, and low tough thorns, though here and there
clearings opened, the scars of recent fires. The gorse-bushes became more frequent
as they got nearer the top; very old and tall they were, gaunt and leggy below but
thick above, and already putting out yellow flowers that glimmered in the gloom and
gave a faint sweet scent. So tall were the spiny thickets that the hobbits could walk
 204
upright under them, passing through long dry aisles carpeted with a deep prickly
mould.
 On the further edge of this broad hill-back they stayed their march and crawled for
hiding underneath a tangled knot of thorns. Their twisted boughs, stooping to the
ground, were overridden by a clambering maze of old briars. Deep inside there was
a hollow hall, raftered with dead branch and bramble, and roofed with the first leaves
and shoots of spring. There they lay for a while, too tired yet to eat; and peering out
through the holes in the covert they watched for the slow growth of day.
 But no day came, only a dead brown twilight. In the East there was a dull red glare
under the lowering cloud: it was not the red of dawn. Across the tumbled lands
between, the mountains of the Ephel Duath frowned at them, black and shapeless
below where night lay thick and did not pass away, above with jagged tops and
edges outlined hard and menacing against the fiery glow. Away to their right a great
shoulder of the mountains stood out, dark and black amid the shadows, thrusting
westward.
 'Which way do we go from here?' asked Frodo. 'Is that the opening of – of the
Morgul Valley, away over there beyond that black mass?'
 'Need we think about it yet?' said Sam, 'Surely we're not going to move any more
today, if day it is?'
 'Perhaps not, perhaps not,' said Gollum. 'But we must go soon, to the Cross-roads.
Yes, to the Cross-roads. That's the way over there yes, Master.'
 The red glare over Mordor died away. The twilight deepened as great vapours rose
in the East and crawled above them. Frodo and Sam took a little food and then lay
down, but Gollum was restless. He would not eat any of their food, but he drank a
little water and then crawled about under the bushes, sniffing and muttering. Then
suddenly he disappeared.
 'Off hunting, I suppose,' said Sam and yawned. It was his turn to sleep first, and he
was soon deep in a dream. He thought he was back in the Bag End garden looking
for something; but he had a heavy pack on his back, which made him stoop. It all
seemed very weedy and rank somehow, and thorns and bracken were invading the
beds down near the bottom hedge.
'A job of work for me, I can see; but I'm so tired,' he kept on saying. Presently he
remembered what he was looking for. 'My pipe!' he said, and with that he woke up.
 'Silly!' he said to himself, as he opened his eyes and wondered why he was lying
down under the hedge. 'It's in your pack all the time!' Then he realized, first that the
pipe might be in his pack but he had no leaf, and next that he was hundreds of miles
from Bag End. He sat up. It seemed to be almost dark. Why had his master let him
sleep on out of turn, right on till evening?
 'Haven't you had no sleep, Mr. Frodo?' he said. 'What's the time? Seems to be
getting late!'
 'No it isn't,' said Frodo. 'But the day is getting darker instead of lighter: darker and
darker. As far as I can tell, it isn't midday yet, and you've only slept for about three
hours.'
 'I wonder what's up,' said Sam. 'Is there a storm coming? If so it's going to be the
worst there ever was. We shall wish we were down a deep hole, not just stuck under
a hedge.' He listened. 'What's that? Thunder, or drums, or what is it?'
 'I don't know,' said Frodo. 'It's been going on for a good while now. Sometimes the
ground seems to tremble, sometimes it seems to be the heavy air throbbing in your
ears.'
 Sam looked round. 'Where's Gollum?' he said. 'Hasn't he come back yet?'
 205
 'No,' said Frodo. 'There's not been a sign or sound of him.'
 'Well, I can't abide him,' said Sam. 'In fact, I've never taken anything on a journey
that I'd have been less sorry to lose on the way. But it would be just like him, after
coming all these miles, to go and get lost now, just when we shall need him most –
that is, if he's ever going to be any use, which I doubt.'
 'You forget the Marshes,' said Frodo. 'I hope nothing has happened to him.'
 'And I hope he's up to no tricks. And anyway I hope he doesn't fall into other
hands, as you might say. Because if he does, we shall soon be in for trouble.'
 At that moment a rolling and rumbling noise was heard again, louder now and
deeper. The ground seemed to quiver under their feet. 'I think we are in for trouble
anyhow,' said Frodo. 'I'm afraid our journey is drawing to an end.'
 'Maybe,' said Sam; 'but where there's life there's hope, as my Gaffer used to say;
and need of vittles, as he mostways used to add. You have a bite, Mr. Frodo, and
then a bit of sleep.'
 The afternoon, as Sam supposed it must be called, wore on. Looking out from the
covert he could see only a dun, shadowless world, fading slowly into a featureless,
colourless gloom. It felt stifling but not warm. Frodo slept unquietly, turning and
tossing, and sometimes murmuring. Twice Sam thought he heard him speaking
Gandalf's name. The time seemed to drag interminably. Suddenly Sam heard a hiss
behind him, and there was Gollum on all fours, peering at them with gleaming eyes.
 'Wake up, wake up! Wake up, sleepies!' he whispered. 'Wake up! No time to lose.
We must go, yes, we must go at once. No time to lose!'
 Sam stared at him suspiciously: he seemed frightened or excited. 'Go now? What's
your little game? It isn't time yet. It can't be tea-time even, leastways not in decent
places where there is tea-time.'
 'Silly!' hissed Gollum. 'We're not in decent places. Time's running short, yes,
running fast. No time to lose. We must go. Wake up. Master, wake up.' He clawed at
Frodo; and Frodo, startled out of sleep, sat up suddenly and seized him by the arm.
Gollum tore himself loose and backed away.
 'They mustn't be silly,' he hissed. 'We must go. No time to lose!' And nothing more
could they get out of him. Where he had been, and what he thought was brewing to
make him in such a hurry, he would not say. Sam was filled with deep suspicion, and
showed it; but Frodo gave no sign of what was passing in his mind. He sighed,
hoisted his pack, and prepared to go out into the ever-gathering darkness.
 Very stealthily Gollum led them down the hillside, keeping under cover wherever it
was possible, and running, almost bent to the ground, across any open space; but
the light was now so dim that even a keen-eyed beast of the wild could scarcely
have seen the hobbits, hooded, in their grey cloaks, nor heard them, walking as
warily as the little people can. Without the crack of a twig or the rustle of a leaf they
passed and vanished.
 For about an hour they went on, silently, in single file, oppressed by the gloom and
by the absolute stillness of the land, broken only now and again by the faint rumbling
as of thunder far away or drum-beats in some hollow of the hills. Down from their
hiding-place they went, and then turning south they steered as straight a course as
Gollum could find across a long broken slope that leaned up towards the mountains.
Presently, not far ahead, looming up like a black wall, they saw a belt of trees. As
they drew nearer they became aware that these were of vast size, very ancient it
seemed, and still towering high, though their tops were gaunt and broken, as if
tempest and lightning-blast had swept across them, but had failed to kill them or to
shake their fathomless roots.
 206
 'The Cross-roads, yes,' whispered Gollum, the first words that had been spoken
since they left their hiding-place. 'We must go that way.' Turning eastward now, he
led them up the slope; and then suddenly there it was before them: the Southward
Road, winding its way about the outer feet of the mountains, until presently it
plunged into the great ring of trees.
 'This is the only way,' whispered Gollum. 'No paths beyond the road. No paths. We
must go to the Cross-roads. But make haste! Be silent!'
 As furtively as scouts within the campment of their enemies, they crept down on to
the road, and stole along its westward edge under the stony bank, grey as the
stones themselves, and soft-footed as hunting cats. At length they reached the trees,
and found that they stood in a great roofless ring, open in the middle to the sombre
sky; and the spaces between their immense boles were like the great dark arches of
some ruined hall. In the very centre four ways met. Behind them lay the road to the
Morannon; before them it ran out again upon its long journey south; to their right the
road from old Osgiliath came climbing up, and crossing, passed out eastward into
darkness: the fourth way, the road they were to take.
 Standing there for a moment filled with dread Frodo became aware that a light was
shining; he saw it glowing on Sam's face beside him. Turning towards it, he saw,
beyond an arch of boughs, the road to Osgiliath running almost as straight as a
stretched ribbon down, down, into the West. There, far away, beyond sad Gondor
now overwhelmed in shade, the Sun was sinking, finding at last the hem of the great
slow-rolling pall of cloud, and falling in an ominous fire towards the yet unsullied Sea.
The brief glow fell upon a huge sitting figure, still and solemn as the great stone
kings of Argonath. The years had gnawed it, and violent hands had maimed it. Its
head was gone, and in its place was set in mockery a round rough-hewn stone,
rudely painted by savage hands in the likeness of a grinning face with one large red
eye in the midst of its forehead. Upon its knees and mighty chair, and all about the
pedestal, were idle scrawls mixed with the foul symbols that the maggot-folk of
Mordor used.
 Suddenly, caught by the level beams, Frodo saw the old king's head: it was lying
rolled away by the roadside. 'Look, Sam!' he cried, startled into speech. 'Look! The
king has got a crown again!'
 The eyes were hollow and the carven beard was broken, but about the high stern
forehead there was a coronal of silver and gold. A trailing plant with flowers like small
white stars had bound itself across the brows as if in reverence for the fallen king,
and in the crevices of his stony hair yellow stonecrop gleamed.
 'They cannot conquer for ever!' said Frodo. And then suddenly the brief glimpse
was gone. The Sun dipped and vanished, and as if at the shuttering of a lamp, black
night fell.
Chapter 8
The Stairs of Cirith Ungol
 Gollum was tugging at Frodo's cloak and hissing with fear and impatience. 'We
must go,' he said. 'We mustn't stand here. Make haste!'
 Reluctantly Frodo turned his back on the West and followed as his guide led him,
out into the darkness of the East. They left the ring of trees and crept along the road
towards the mountains. This road, too, ran straight for a while, but soon it began to
bend away southwards, until it came right under the great shoulder of rock that they
had seen from the distance. Black and forbidding it loomed above them, darker than
 207
the dark sky behind. Crawling under its shadow the road went on, and rounding it
sprang east again and began to climb steeply.
 Frodo and Sam were plodding along with heavy hearts, no longer able to care
greatly about their peril. Frodo's head was bowed; his burden was dragging him
down again. As soon as the great Cross-roads had been passed, the weight of it,
almost forgotten in Ithilien, had begun to grow once more. Now, feeling the way
become steep before his feet, he looked wearily up; and then he saw it, even as
Gollum had said that he would: the city of the Ringwraiths. He cowered against the
stony bank.
 A long-tilted valley, a deep gulf of shadow, ran back far into the mountains. Upon
the further side, some way within the valley's arms high on a rocky seat upon the
black knees of the Ephel Duath, stood the walls and tower of Minas Morgul. All was
dark about it, earth and sky, but it was lit with light. Not the imprisoned moonlight
welling through the marble walls of Minas Ithil long ago, Tower of the Moon, fair and
radiant in the hollow of the hills. Paler indeed than the moon ailing in some slow
eclipse was the light of it now, wavering and blowing like a noisome exhalation of
decay, a corpse-light, a light that illuminated nothing. In the walls and tower windows
showed, like countless black holes looking inward into emptiness; but the topmost
course of the tower revolved slowly, first one way and then another, a huge ghostly
head leering into the night. For a moment the three companions stood there,
shrinking, staring up with unwilling eyes. Gollum was the first to recover. Again he
pulled at their cloaks urgently, but he spoke no word. Almost he dragged them
forward. Every step was reluctant, and time seemed to slow its pace, so that
between the raising of a foot and the setting of it down minutes of loathing passed.
 So they came slowly to the white bridge. Here the road, gleaming faintly, passed
over the stream in the midst of the valley, and went on, winding deviously up towards
the city's gate: a black mouth opening in the outer circle of the northward walls. Wide
flats lay on either bank, shadowy meads filled with pale white flowers. Luminous
these were too, beautiful and yet horrible of shape, like the demented forms in an
uneasy dream; and they gave forth a faint sickening charnel-smell; an odour of
rottenness filled the air. From mead to mead the bridge sprang. Figures stood there
at its head, carven with cunning in forms human and bestial, but all corrupt and
loathsome. The water flowing beneath was silent, and it steamed, but the vapour that
rose from it, curling and twisting about the bridge, was deadly cold. Frodo felt his
senses reeling and his mind darkening. Then suddenly, as if some force were at
work other than his own will, he began to hurry, tottering forward, his groping hands
held out, his head lolling from side to side. Both Sam and Gollum ran after him. Sam
caught his master in his arms, as he stumbled and almost fell, right on the threshold
of the bridge.
 'Not that way! No, not that way!' whispered Gollum, but the breath between his
teeth seemed to tear the heavy stillness like a whistle, and he cowered to the ground
in terror.
 'Hold up, Mr. Frodo!' muttered Sam in Frodo's ear. 'Come back! Not that way.
Gollum says not, and for once I agree with him.'
 Frodo passed his hand over his brow and wrenched his eyes away from the city on
the hill. The luminous tower fascinated him, and he fought the desire that was on him
to run up the gleaming road towards its gate. At last with an effort he turned back,
and as he did so, he felt the Ring resisting him, dragging at the chain about his neck;
and his eyes too, as he looked away, seemed for the moment to have been blinded.
The darkness before him was impenetrable.
 208
 Gollum, crawling on the ground like a frightened animal, was already vanishing into
the gloom. Sam, supporting and guiding his stumbling master, followed after him as
quickly as he could. Not far from the near bank of the stream there was a gap in the
stone-wall beside the road. Through this they passed, and Sam saw that they were
on a narrow path that gleamed faintly at first, as the main road did, until climbing
above the meads of deadly flowers it faded and went dark, winding its crooked way
up into the northern sides of the valley.
 Along this path the hobbits trudged, side by side, unable to see Gollum in front of
them, except when he turned back to beckon them on. Then his eyes shone with a
green-white light, reflecting the noisome Morgul-sheen perhaps, or kindled by some
answering mood within. Of that deadly gleam and of the dark eyeholes Frodo and
Sam were always conscious, ever glancing fearfully over their shoulders, and ever
dragging their eyes back to find the darkening path. Slowly they laboured on. As they
rose above the stench and vapours of the poisonous stream their breath became
easier and their heads clearer; but now their limbs were deadly tired, as if they had
walked all night under a burden, or had been swimming long against a heavy tide of
water. At last they could go no further without a halt.
 Frodo stopped and sat down on a stone. They had now climbed up to the top of a
great hump of bare rock. Ahead of them there was a bay in the valley-side, and
round the head of this the path went on, no more than a wide ledge with a chasm on
the right; across the sheer southward face of the mountain it crawled upwards, until it
disappeared into the blackness above.
 'I must rest a while, Sam,' whispered Frodo. 'It's heavy on me, Sam lad, very
heavy. I wonder how far I can carry it? Anyway I must rest before we venture on to
that.' He pointed to the narrow way ahead.
 'Sssh! ssh!' hissed Gollum hurrying back to them. 'Sssh!' His fingers were on his
lips and he shook his head urgently. Tugging at Frodo's sleeve, he pointed towards
the path; but Frodo would not move.
 'Not yet,' he said, 'not yet.' Weariness and more than weariness oppressed him; it
seemed as if a heavy spell was laid on his mind and body. 'I must rest,' he muttered.
 At this Gollum's fear and agitation became so great that he spoke again, hissing
behind his hand, as if to keep the sound from unseen listeners in the air. 'Not here,
no. Not rest here. Fools! Eyes can see us. When they come to the bridge they will
see us. Come away! Climb, climb! Come!'
 'Come, Mr. Frodo,' said Sam. 'He's right, again. We can't stay here.'
 'All right,' said Frodo in a remote voice, as of one speaking half asleep. 'I will try.'
Wearily he got to his feet.
 But it was too late. At that moment the rock quivered and trembled beneath them.
The great rumbling noise, louder than ever before, rolled in the ground and echoed
in the mountains. Then with searing suddenness there came a great red flash. Far
beyond the eastern mountains it leapt into the sky and splashed the lowering clouds
with crimson. In that valley of shadow and cold deathly light it seemed unbearably
violent and fierce. Peaks of stone and ridges like notched knives sprang out in
staring black against the uprushing flame in Gorgoroth. Then came a great crack of
thunder.
 And Minas Morgul answered. There was a flare of livid lightnings: forks of blue
flame springing up from the tower and from the encircling hills into the sullen clouds.
The earth groaned; and out of the city there came a cry. Mingled with harsh high
voices as of birds of prey, and the shrill neighing of horses wild with rage and fear,
there came a rending screech, shivering, rising swiftly to a piercing pitch beyond the
 209
range of hearing. The hobbits wheeled round towards it, and cast themselves down,
holding their hands upon their ears.
 As the terrible cry ended, falling back through a long sickening wail to silence,
Frodo slowly raised his head. Across the narrow valley, now almost on a level with
his eyes, the walls of the evil city stood, and its cavernous gate, shaped like an open
mouth with gleaming teeth, was gaping wide. And out of the gate an army came.
 All that host was clad in sable, dark as the night. Against the wan walls and the
luminous pavement of the road Frodo could see them, small black figures in rank
upon rank, marching swiftly and silently, passing outwards in an endless stream.
Before them went a great cavalry of horsemen moving like ordered shadows, and at
their head was one greater than all the rest: a Rider, all black, save that on his
hooded head he had a helm like a crown that flickered with a perilous light. Now he
was drawing near the bridge below, and Frodo's staring eyes followed him, unable to
wink or to withdraw. Surely there was the Lord of the Nine Riders returned to earth to
lead his ghastly host to battle? Here, yes here indeed was the haggard king whose
cold hand had smitten down the Ring-bearer with his deadly knife. The old wound
throbbed with pain and a great chill spread towards Frodo's heart.
 Even as these thoughts pierced him with dread and held him bound as with a spell,
the Rider halted suddenly, right before the entrance of the bridge, and behind him all
the host stood still. There was a pause, a dead silence. Maybe it was the Ring that
called to the Wraith-lord, and for a moment he was troubled, sensing some other
power within his valley. This way and that turned the dark head helmed and crowned
with fear, sweeping the shadows with its unseen eyes. Frodo waited, like a bird at
the approach of a snake, unable to move. And as he waited, he felt, more urgent
than ever before, the command that he should put on the Ring. But great as the
pressure was, he felt no inclination now to yield to it. He knew that the Ring would
only betray him, and that he had not, even if he put it on, the power to face the
Morgul-king – not yet. There was no longer any answer to that command in his own
will, dismayed by terror though it was, and he felt only the beating upon him of a
great power from outside. It took his hand, and as Frodo watched with his mind, not
willing it but in suspense (as if he looked on some old story far away), it moved the
hand inch by inch towards the chain upon his neck. Then his own will stirred; slowly
it forced the hand back, and set it to find another thing, a thing lying hidden near his
breast. Cold and hard it seemed as his grip closed on it: the phial of Galadriel, so
long treasured, and almost forgotten till that hour. As he touched it, for a while all
thought of the Ring was banished from his mind. He sighed and bent his head.
 At that moment the Wraith-king turned and spurred his horse and rode across the
bridge, and all his dark host followed him. Maybe the elven-hoods defied his unseen
eyes, and the mind of his small enemy; being strengthened, had turned aside his
thought. But he was in haste. Already the hour had struck, and at his great Master's
bidding he must march with war into the West.
 Soon he had passed, like a shadow into shadow, down the winding road, and
behind him still the black ranks crossed the bridge. So great an army had never
issued from that vale since the days of Isildur's might; no host so fell and strong in
arms had yet assailed the fords of Anduin; and yet it was but one and not the
greatest of the hosts that Mordor now sent forth.
 Frodo stirred. And suddenly his heart went out to Faramir. 'The storm has burst at
last,' he thought. 'This great array of spears and swords is going to Osgiliath. Will
Faramir get across in time? He guessed it, but did he know the hour? And who can
now hold the fords when the King of the Nine Riders comes? And other armies will
 210
come. I am too late. All is lost. I tarried on the way. All is lost. Even if my errand is
performed, no one will ever know. There will be no one I can tell. It will be in vain.'
Overcome with weakness he wept. And still the host of Morgul crossed the bridge.
 Then at a great distance, as if it came out of memories of the Shire, some sunlit
early morning, when the day called and doors were opening, he heard Sam's voice
speaking. 'Wake up, Mr. Frodo! Wake up!' Had the voice added: 'Your breakfast is
ready,' he would hardly have been surprised. Certainly Sam was urgent. 'Wake up,
Mr. Frodo! They're gone,' he said.
 There was a dull clang. The gates of Minas Morgul had closed. The last rank of
spears had vanished down the road. The tower still grinned across the valley, but the
light was fading in it. The whole city was falling back into a dark brooding shade, and
silence. Yet still it was filled with watchfulness.
 'Wake up, Mr. Frodo! They're gone, and we'd better go too. There's something still
alive in that place, something with eyes, or a seeing mind, if you take me; and the
longer we stay in one spot, the sooner it will get on to us. Come on, Mr. Frodo!'
 Frodo raised his head, and then stood up. Despair had not left him, but the
weakness had passed. He even smiled grimly, feeling now as clearly as a moment
before he had felt the opposite, that what he had to do, he had to do, if he could, and
that whether Faramir or Aragorn or Elrond or Galadriel or Gandalf or anyone else
ever knew about it was beside the purpose. He took his staff in one hand and the
phial in his other. When he saw that the clear light was already welling through his
fingers, he thrust it into his bosom and held it against his heart. Then turning from the
city of Morgul, now no more than a grey glimmer across a dark gulf, he prepared to
take the upward road.
 Gollum, it seemed, had crawled off along the ledge into the darkness beyond,
when the gates of Minas Morgul opened, leaving the hobbits where they lay. He now
came creeping back, his teeth chattering and his fingers snapping. 'Foolish! Silly!' he
hissed. 'Make haste! They mustn't think danger has passed. It hasn't. Make haste!'
 They did not answer, but they followed him on to the climbing ledge. It was little to
the liking of either of them, not even after facing so many other perils; but it did not
last long. Soon the path reached a rounded angle where the mountain-side swelled
out again, and there it suddenly entered a narrow opening in the rock. They had
come to the first stair that Gollum had spoken of. The darkness was almost
complete, and they could see nothing much beyond their hands' stretch; but
Gollum's eyes shone pale, several feet above, as he turned back towards them.
 'Careful!' he whispered. 'Steps. Lots of steps. Must be careful!'
 Care was certainly needed. Frodo and Sam at first felt easier, having now a wall on
either side, but the stairway was almost as steep as a ladder, and as they climbed up
and up, they became more and more aware of the long black fall behind them. And
the steps were narrow, spaced unevenly, and often treacherous: they were worn and
smooth at the edges, and some were broken, and some cracked as foot was set
upon them. The hobbits struggled on, until at last they were clinging with desperate
fingers to the steps ahead, and forcing their aching knees to bend and straighten;
and ever as the stair cut its way deeper into the sheer mountain the rocky walls rose
higher and higher above their heads.
 At length, just as they felt that they could endure no more, they saw Gollum's eyes
peering down at them again. 'We're up,' he whispered. 'First stair's past. Clever
hobbits to climb so high, very clever hobbits. Just a few more little steps and that's
all, yes.'
 Dizzy and very tired Sam, and Frodo following him, crawled up the last step, and
 211
sat down rubbing their legs and knees. They were in a deep dark passage that
seemed still to go up before them, though at a gentler slope and without steps.
Gollum did not let them rest long.
 'There's another stair still,' he said. 'Much longer stair. Rest when we get to the top
of next stair. Not yet.'
 Sam groaned. 'Longer, did you say?' he asked.
 'Yes, yess, longer,' said Gollum. 'But not so difficult. Hobbits have climbed the
Straight Stair. Next comes the Winding Stair.'
 'And what after that?' said Sam.
 'We shall see,' said Gollum softly. 'O yes, we shall see!'
 'I thought you said there was a tunnel,' said Sam. 'Isn't there a tunnel or something
to go through?'
 'O yes, there's a tunnel,' said Gollum. 'But hobbits can rest before they try that. If
they get through that, they'll be nearly at the top. Very nearly, if they get through. O
yes!'
 Frodo shivered. The climb had made him sweat, but now he felt cold and clammy,
and there was a chill draught in the dark passage, blowing down from the invisible
heights above. He got up and shook himself. 'Well, let's go on!' he said. 'This is no
place to sit in.'
 The passage seemed to go on for miles, and always the chill air flowed over them,
rising as they went on to a bitter wind. The mountains seemed to be trying with their
deadly breath to daunt them, to turn them back from the secrets of the high places,
or to blow them away into the darkness behind. They only knew that they had come
to the end, when suddenly they felt no wall at their right hand. They could see very
little. Great black shapeless masses and deep grey shadows loomed above them
and about them, but now and again a dull red light flickered up under the lowering
clouds, and for a moment they were aware of tall peaks, in front and on either side,
like pillars holding up a vast sagging roof. They seemed to have climbed up many
hundreds of feet, on to a wide shelf. A cliff was on their left and a chasm on their
right.
 Gollum led the way close under the cliff. For the present they were no longer
climbing, but the ground was now more broken and dangerous in the dark, and there
were blocks and lumps of fallen stone in the way. Their going was slow and cautious.
How many hours had passed since they had entered the Morgul Vale neither Sam
nor Frodo could any longer guess. The night seemed endless.
 212
 At length they were once more aware of a wall looming up, and once more a
stairway opened before them. Again they halted, and again they began to climb. It
was a long and weary ascent; but this stairway did not delve into the mountain-side.
Here the huge cliff face sloped backwards, and the path like a snake wound to and
fro across it. At one point it crawled sideways right to the edge of the dark chasm,
and Frodo glancing down saw below him as a vast deep pit the great ravine at the
head of the Morgul Valley. Down in its depths glimmered like a glow-worm thread the
wraith-road from the dead city to the Nameless Pass. He turned hastily away.
 Still on and up the stairway bent and crawled, until at last with a final flight, short
and straight, it climbed out again on to another level. The path had veered away from
the main pass in the great ravine, and it now followed its own perilous course at the
bottom of a lesser cleft among the higher regions of the Ephel Duath. Dimly the
hobbits could discern tall piers and jagged pinnacles of stone on either side, between
which were great crevices and fissures blacker than the night, where forgotten
winters had gnawed and carved the sunless stone. And now the red light in the sky
seemed stronger; though they could not tell whether a dreadful morning were indeed
coming to this place of shadow, or whether they saw only the flame of some great
violence of Sauron in the torment of Gorgoroth beyond. Still far ahead, and still high
above, Frodo, looking up, saw, as he guessed, the very crown of this bitter road.
Against the sullen redness of the eastern sky a cleft was outlined in the topmost
ridge, narrow, deep-cloven between two black shoulders; and on either shoulder was
a horn of stone.
 He paused and looked more attentively. The horn upon the left was tall and
slender; and in it burned a red light, or else the red light in the land beyond was
shining through a hole. He saw now: it was a black tower poised above the outer
pass. He touched Sam's arm and pointed.
 'I don't like the look of that!' said Sam. 'So this secret way of yours is guarded after
all,' he growled, turning to Gollum. 'As you knew all along, I suppose?'
 'All ways are watched, yes,' said Gollum. 'Of course they are. But hobbits must try
some way. This may be least watched. Perhaps they've all gone away to big battle,
perhaps!'
 'Perhaps,' grunted Sam. 'Well, it still seems a long way off, and a long way up
before we get there. And there's still the tunnel. I think you ought to rest now, Mr.
 213
Frodo. I don't know what time of day or night it is, but we've kept going for hours and
hours.'
 'Yes, we must rest,' said Frodo. 'Let us find some corner out of the wind, and
gather our strength – for the last lap.' For so he felt it to be. The terrors of the land
beyond, and the deed to be done there, seemed remote, too far off yet to trouble
him. All his mind was bent on getting through or over this impenetrable wall and
guard. If once he could do that impossible thing, then somehow the errand would be
accomplished, or so it seemed to him in that dark hour of weariness, still labouring in
the stony shadows under Cirith Ungol.
 In a dark crevice between two great piers of rock they sat down: Frodo and Sam a
little way within, and Gollum crouched upon the ground near the opening. There the
hobbits took what they expected would be their last meal before they went down into
the Nameless Land, maybe the last meal they would ever eat together. Some of the
food of Gondor they ate, and wafers of the waybread of the Elves, and they drank a
little. But of their water they were sparing and took only enough to moisten their dry
mouths.
 'I wonder when we'll find water again?' said Sam. 'But I suppose even over there
they drink? Orcs drink, don't they?'
 'Yes, they drink,' said Frodo. 'But do not let us speak of that. Such drink is not for
us.'
 'Then all the more need to fill our bottles,' said Sam. 'But there isn't any water up
here: not a sound or a trickle have I heard. And anyway Faramir said we were not to
drink any water in Morgul.'
 'No water flowing out of Imlad Morgul, were his words,' said Frodo. 'We are not in
that valley now, and if we came on a spring it would be flowing into it and not out of
it.'
 'I wouldn't trust it,' said Sam, 'not till I was dying of thirst. There's a wicked feeling
about this place.' He sniffed. 'And a smell, I fancy. Do you notice it? A queer kind of a
smell, stuffy. I don't like it.'
 'I don't like anything here at all,' said Frodo, 'step or stone, breath or bone. Earth,
air and water all seem accursed. But so our path is laid.'
 'Yes, that's so,' said Sam. 'And we shouldn't be here at all, if we'd known more
about it before we started. But I suppose it's often that way. The brave things in the
old tales and songs, Mr. Frodo: adventures, as I used to call them. I used to think
that they were things the wonderful folk of the stories went out and looked for,
because they wanted them, because they were exciting and life was a bit dull, a kind
of a sport, as you might say. But that's not the way of it with the tales that really
mattered, or the ones that stay in the mind. Folk seem to have been just landed in
them, usually – their paths were laid that way, as you put it. But I expect they had
lots of chances, like us, of turning back, only they didn't. And if they had, we
shouldn't know, because they'd have been forgotten. We hear about those as just
went on – and not all to a good end, mind you; at least not to what folk inside a story
and not outside it call a good end. You know, coming home, and finding things all
right, though not quite the same – like old Mr Bilbo. But those aren't always the best
tales to hear, though they may be the best tales to get landed in! I wonder what sort
of a tale we've fallen into?'
 'I wonder,' said Frodo. 'But I don't know. And that's the way of a real tale. Take any
one that you're fond of. You may know, or guess, what kind of a tale it is, happyending or sad-ending,
but the people in it don't know. And you don't want them to.'
 'No, sir, of course not. Beren now, he never thought he was going to get that
 214
Silmaril from the Iron Crown in Thangorodrim, and yet he did, and that was a worse
place and a blacker danger than ours. But that's a long tale, of course, and goes on
past the happiness and into grief and beyond it – and the Silmaril went on and came
to Earendil. And why, sir, I never thought of that before! We've got – you've got some
of the light of it in that star-glass that the Lady gave you! Why, to think of it, we're in
the same tale still! It's going on. Don't the great tales never end?'
 'No, they never end as tales,' said Frodo. 'But the people in them come, and go
when their part's ended. Our part will end later – or sooner.'
 'And then we can have some rest and some sleep,' said Sam. He laughed grimly.
'And I mean just that, Mr. Frodo. I mean plain ordinary rest, and sleep, and waking
up to a morning's work in the garden. I'm afraid that's all I'm hoping for all the time.
All the big important plans are not for my sort. Still, I wonder if we shall ever be put
into songs or tales. We're in one, or course; but I mean: put into words, you know,
told by the fireside, or read out of a great big book with red and black letters, years
and years afterwards. And people will say: "Let's hear about Frodo and the Ring! "
And they'll say: "Yes, that's one of my favourite stories. Frodo was very brave. wasn't
he, dad?" "Yes, my boy, the famousest of the hobbits, and that's saying a lot."'
 'It's saying a lot too much,' said Frodo, and he laughed, a long clear laugh from his
heart. Such a sound had not been heard in those places since Sauron came to
Middle-earth. To Sam suddenly it seemed as if all the stones were listening and the
tall rocks leaning over them. But Frodo did not heed them; he laughed again. 'Why,
Sam,' he said, 'to hear you somehow makes me as merry as if the story was already
written. But you've left out one of the chief characters: Samwise the stouthearted. "I
want to hear more about Sam, dad. Why didn't they put in more of his talk, dad?
That's what I like, it makes me laugh. And Frodo wouldn't have got far without Sam,
would he, dad? "'
 'Now, Mr. Frodo,' said Sam, 'you shouldn't make fun. I was serious.'
 'So was I,' said Frodo, 'and so I am. We're going on a bit too fast. You and I, Sam,
are still stuck in the worst places of the story, and it is all too likely that some will say
at this point: "Shut the book now, dad; we don't want to read any more."'
 'Maybe,' said Sam, 'but I wouldn't be one to say that. Things done and over and
made into part of the great tales are different. Why, even Gollum might be good in a
tale, better than he is to have by you, anyway. And he used to like tales himself
once, by his own account. I wonder if he thinks he's the hero or the villain?
 'Gollum!' he called. 'Would you like to be the hero – now where's he got to again?'
 There was no sign of him at the mouth of their shelter nor in the shadows near. He
had refused their food, though he had, as usual, accepted a mouthful of water; and
then he had seemed to curl up for a sleep. They had supposed that one at any rate
of his objects in his long absence the day before had been to hunt for food to his own
liking; and now he had evidently slipped off again while they talked. But what for this
time?
 'I don't like his sneaking off without saying,' said Sam. 'And least of all now. He
can't be looking for food up here, not unless there's some kind of rock he fancies.
Why, there isn't even a bit of moss!'
 'It's no good worrying about him now,' said Frodo. 'We couldn't have got so far, not
even within sight of the pass, without him, and so we'll have to put up with his ways.
If he's false, he's false.'
 'All the same, I'd rather have him under my eye,' said Sam. 'All the more so, if he's
false. Do you remember he never would say if this pass was guarded or no? And
now we see a tower there – and it may be deserted, and it may not. Do you think
 215
he's gone to fetch them, Orcs or whatever they are?'
 'No, I don't think so,' answered Frodo. 'Even if he's up to some wickedness, and I
suppose that's not unlikely, I don't think it's that: not to fetch Orcs, or any servants of
the Enemy. Why wait till now, and go through all the labour of the climb, and come
so near the land he fears? He could probably have betrayed us to Orcs many times
since we met him. No, if it's anything, it will be some little private trick of his own –
that he thinks is quite secret.'
 'Well, I suppose you're right, Mr. Frodo,' said Sam. 'Not that it comforts me mightily.
I don't make no mistake: I don't doubt he'd hand me over to Orcs as gladly as kiss
his hand. But I was forgetting – his Precious. No, I suppose the whole time it's been
The Precious for poor Smeagol. That's the one idea in all his little schemes, if he has
any. But how bringing us up here will help him in that is more than I can guess.'
 'Very likely he can't guess himself,' said Frodo. 'And I don't think he's got just one
plain scheme in his muddled head. I think he really is in part trying to save the
Precious from the Enemy, as long as he can. For that would be the last disaster for
himself too. if the Enemy got it. And in the other part, perhaps, he's just biding his
time and waiting on chance.'
 'Yes, Slinker and Stinker, as I've said before,' said Sam. 'But the nearer they get to
the Enemy's land the more like Stinker Slinker will get. Mark my words: if ever we get
to the pass, he won't let us really take the precious thing over the border without
making some kind of trouble.'
 'We haven't got there yet,' said Frodo.
 'No, but we'd better keep our eyes skinned till we do. If we're caught napping,
Stinker will come out on top pretty quick. Not but what it would be safe for you to
have a wink now, master. Safe, if you lay close to me. I'd be dearly glad to see you
have a sleep. I'd keep watch over you; and anyway, if you lay near, with my arm
round you, no one could come pawing you without your Sam knowing it.'
 'Sleep!' said Frodo and sighed, as if out of a desert he had seen a mirage of cool
green. 'Yes, even here I could sleep.'
 'Sleep then, master! Lay your head in my lap.'
 And so Gollum found them hours later, when he returned, crawling and creeping
down the path out of the gloom ahead. Sam sat propped against the stone, his head
dropping sideways and his breathing heavy. In his lap lay Frodo's head, drowned
deep in sleep; upon his white forehead lay one of Sam's brown hands, and the other
lay softly upon his master's breast. Peace was in both their faces.
 Gollum looked at them. A strange expression passed over his lean hungry face.
The gleam faded from his eyes, and they went dim and grey, old and tired. A spasm
of pain seemed to twist him, and he turned away, peering back up towards the pass,
shaking his head, as if engaged in some interior debate. Then he came back, and
slowly putting out a trembling hand, very cautiously he touched Frodo's knee – but
almost the touch was a caress. For a fleeting moment, could one of the sleepers
have seen him, they would have thought that they beheld an old weary hobbit,
shrunken by the years that had carried him far beyond his time, beyond friends and
kin, and the fields and streams of youth, an old starved pitiable thing.
 But at that touch Frodo stirred and cried out softly in his sleep, and immediately
Sam was wide awake. The first thing he saw was Gollum – 'pawing at master,' as he
thought.
 'Hey you!' he said roughly. 'What are you up to?'
 'Nothing, nothing,' said Gollum softly. 'Nice Master!'
 'I daresay,' said Sam. 'But where have you been to – sneaking off and sneaking
 216
back, you old villain?'
 Gollum withdrew himself, and a green glint flickered under his heavy lids. Almost
spider-like he looked now, crouched back on his bent limbs, with his protruding eyes.
The fleeting moment had passed, beyond recall. 'Sneaking, sneaking!' he hissed.
'Hobbits always so polite, yes. O nice hobbits! Smeagol brings them up secret ways
that nobody else could find. Tired he is, thirsty he is, yes thirsty; and he guides them
and he searches for paths, and they say sneak, sneak. Very nice friends, O yes my
precious, very nice.'
 Sam felt a bit remorseful, though not more trustful. 'Sorry,' he said. 'I'm sorry, but
you startled me out of my sleep. And I shouldn't have been sleeping, and that made
me a bit sharp. But Mr. Frodo, he's that tired, I asked him to have a wink; and well,
that's how it is. Sorry. But where have you been to?'
 'Sneaking,' said Gollum, and the green glint did not leave his eyes.
 'O very well,' said Sam, 'have it your own way! I don't suppose it's so far from the
truth. And now we'd better all be sneaking along together. What's the time? Is it
today or tomorrow?'
 'It's tomorrow,' said Gollum, 'or this was tomorrow when hobbits went to sleep.
Very foolish, very dangerous – if poor Smeagol wasn't sneaking about to watch.'
 'I think we shall get tired of that word soon,' said Sam. 'But never mind. I'll wake
master up.' Gently he smoothed the hair back from Frodo's brow, and bending down
spoke softly to him.
 'Wake up, Mr. Frodo! Wake up!'
 Frodo stirred and opened his eyes, and smiled, seeing Sam's face bending over
him. 'Calling me early aren't you, Sam?' he said. 'It's dark still!'
 'Yes it's always dark here,' said Sam. 'But Gollum's come back Mr. Frodo, and he
says it's tomorrow. So we must be walking on. The last lap.'
 Frodo drew a deep breath and sat up. 'The last lap!' he said. 'Hullo, Smeagol!
Found any food? Have you had any rest?'
 'No food, no rest, nothing for Smeagol,' said Gollum. 'He's a sneak.'
 Sam clicked his tongue, but restrained himself.
 'Don't take names to yourself, Smeagol,' said Frodo. 'It's unwise whether they are
true or false.'
 'Smeagol has to take what's given him,' answered Gollum. 'He was given that
name by kind Master Samwise, the hobbit that knows so much.'
 Frodo looked at Sam. 'Yes sir,' he said. 'I did use the word, waking up out of my
sleep sudden and all and finding him at hand. I said I was sorry, but I soon shan't
be.'
 'Come, let it pass then,' said Frodo. 'But now we seem to have come to the point,
you and I, Smeagol. Tell me. Can we find the rest of the way by ourselves? We're in
sight of the pass, of a way in, and if we can find it now, then I suppose our
agreement can be said to be over. You have done what you promised, and you're
free: free to go back to food and rest, wherever you wish to go, except to servants of
the Enemy. And one day I may reward you, I or those that remember me.'
 'No, no, not yet,' Gollum whined. 'O no! They can't find the way themselves, can
they? O no indeed. There's the tunnel coming. Smeagol must go on. No rest. No
food. Not yet.' 
